MY BANK is always good to me. I have banked with them since I was 13 years old. Everything has always been on the up-and-up. It is the only bank I have dealt with. You are very personable, almost like a family.
MY BANK is the best for me. They help people when they really need help. Because it's the best.
MY BANK has been 100 percent on top on any bank. They've been absolutely amazing, the tellers all the way down to all of the tellers, and they are absolutely amazing. They provide an excellent service and it's from the time you walk in by the time you leave. We're all satisfied with them since, and every need that I've had there. I've never gotten better service or personal attention the way I do when I go to MY BANK.
Absolutely no problems with them. Everything has been great. Very happy with their service. No trouble whatsoever.
Absolutely. They are efficient, courteous and helpful.
Actually it's the friendliness.
Actually, we've never had any problems with them since we moved here 15 years ago. We've never had any problems. They've been very helpful. We've opened accounts with them, and they've led us in a good direction. As long as I don't have any problem with them, they are fine. They seem to know what they are doing, and I haven't had any banking problems with them of any kind.
All my questions are answered, and they are very helpful.
All the mentioned things I told you. I do not know. Everything together makes the bank, not just one thing.
All the people there are very helpful and never had an issue. Everyone knows me.
All the reasons we have talked about. Everybody is pleasant, and they don't make many mistakes.
All the tellers, when I walk in, they greet you, call you by name, they treat you like a family member or friend and not a number. Every time I go in there, they are able to help me. If they aren't able to, the branch manager helps me. They are all good. They are all dressed nice. I was having problems, several months back with one of my accounts, so I sat down, and they called the main branch, and took the time to do that. That wasn't the only thing, I had to ask questions about transferring money from an IRA, just very helpful. I'm going to say, the manager, Cari Wells, is very helpful, very welcoming. She treats people with respect, and very helpful to the tellers. All the tellers are wonderful.
All the things you addressed. They are always a pleasure to deal with and have made an effort to know who I am.
All these things you asked about is why I rate it absolutely the best. I like them a lot.
Always nice, they have conversation, and it's very convenient.
Anytime I go in there, they are courteous, they take care of what I need, and they are helpful. I just really like them. The other thing is convenience. The hours that branch has. I work 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 a.m., so it's nice to get in there after 5:00 p.m.
Anytime I go in they answer my questions, they take care of my questions. They are friendly and courteous. The convenience of where they are located.
Anytime we need assistance, they advise us and give assistance. The girls know me, my kids, and my family. They are patient, and I can't say enough good things about those girls. I'll know when I'm close to overdrawing, because the girls will call me to let me know.
As I answered to your questions, everything is excellent, and other banks I have worked with weren't. I did business with MY BANK before and then went to another bank. That was a mistake. I should have stayed with them.
As I'm walking in the door, they ask me, Will this be a transfer, Mr. Jackson? because I do one every month. They pursue my needs as I'm walking in the door. The girls at the cashier area, they pull out my previous paperwork for my transaction history before I even get to the front.
As of right now, I only have the one visit to go by. I was very impressed by their level of service; not only by how I was treated, but how my family members were treated who were with me. I was very pleased with the service that was provided. The service was very professional and very polite. I felt like the level of friendliness was sincere. It wasn't make-believe, or put on. They were honest.
At our branch it's a nice place. The people are very nice and good. I have had no problems with MY BANK. They are polite. I've banked there for a long time. They are nice to deal with.
At the Elharth North branch the tellers are nice. You walk in there; they are constantly smiling. They know me by name. I can walk in there; they take care of me. I can walk in there, give cash to the teller, and they know what to do with it. It says something when you trust them like that. The manager, Amy, is always nice. Everybody is always nice. I've never had an issue there. I told my landlord here at the farm about it, and he was always a Chase member. He switched over to MY BANK.
Basically, I feel that they took care of everything. Very little was left to chance, and I'm very satisfied with the customer service.
Because all of the tellers are great in there. I've been banking with them for years, and my mom's been there for over 40 years. They do good at that branch. Never had any problems. Jeff and Monique are very friendly. When the tellers leave, the ones that have been there for a while, I get sad.
Because all the times I've gone in MY BANK, they are always nice and friendly.
Because any time I call, or go in there, they are there for me 24 hours a day. They get right down to the problems. They answer any questions. They are friendly and helpful. They've never had a snobby person. It's just the information they have for you, and what they can do for you.
Because any time we've had any issues, we've called them, and they've fixed them immediately. They greet us at the door with our names, and they notice our vehicles. They're very friendly. They go above and beyond. We have a car loan with them. They worked with us on it. We went through several different vehicles, and they helped us out a lot. They explained it to us, and they told us to take our time.
Because every time I have a problem, they take care of it. Terry is a good manager there. I'm very satisfied. I had a few issues in the past, and they solved them. Sometimes, I've had companies draft my account and take too much. They've gotten whatever paperwork I might have needed fast, and helped me work it out. It's just their general service, they're very friendly. I like them all.
Because every time I have had fraud problems, they have taken care of it before it even gets to my account.
Because every time I have to deal with them, I get good service, and they know my name. I enjoy working with everyone there.
Because everyone is very nice there and very helpful. I had to set up a bank account, and they sat me down right away, and told me all the benefits and kinds of accounts I could have there. They were very helpful with that. Just the overall atmosphere of the bank.
Because everything is always professional. They answer my questions. I never have to wait in line; if I do, it's not for very long. It's right around the corner from my work, and it has easy access.
Because everything I've ever needed they've been very helpful and been able to help me with anything I've ever needed. Always friendly, know who I am, and I just like it there.
Because everything was excellent. Convenience.
Because I always get prompt service. The tellers all know me by name, and they greet me when I come through the door.
Because I am dealing with another bank that I am not happy with. MY BANK is much nicer and the employees are wonderful. I have been banking with MY BANK for a long time now.
Because I am satisfied with them.
Because I as shared, I currently work with two other banks, and the customer service and follow up was not good at all. I have been at MY BANK for about three years. They are outstanding. I like the customer service and the feed back. I like the fees and the use of online banking, the way its set up. I appreciate the way I'm treated in the bank. They are eager to help with no hesitations, and I like that.
Because I do. They're courteous, they're awesome. I've never ever had a banking experience like MY BANK. I've been to lots of banks, and always had problems with other banks. I've been with MY BANK for several years, and I've had nothing but happiness with them. They take care of my needs, and always take care of any problems I come across.
Because I get undivided attention. I think everything in general.
Because I go in there and it's like Cheers, it feels like going home. Even when they change, the new tellers are very nice as well.  I just really like it. Maybe it's because they know my name, it's just great.
Because I had a bad experience with another bank, and I moved to MY BANK. I have not had any bad experiences with this bank. Employees care for the customer; they do everything for the customers.
Because I have always gotten exactly what I needed. They are helpful, as I have had several loans with them. I now have online banking with them. The people there know who I am, and I know them. I have not had any issues with them.
Because I have had a bad experience at another bank, and this one is the best banks that I have ever had. They are really nice. They always take care of everything I need to run my business. For any questions I have, they always help me, and with anything I need. They always help me with everything. I really don't know what to say, but they've always been really nice to me there.
Because I have never had a problem ever. They've always been helpful and good to me. For some reason, they always know my name. It's like they all know me. It's easy to get to, and there's no waiting. I can't remember the last time I had to wait. They're always friendly and well-mannered. It's just excellent. If I win the lottery tomorrow, I'll put it in there.
Because I have no reason not to. I've never had any negative of any kind. They're personal.
Because I haven't had any problems.
Because I haven't had one problem since I've gone there. If there is a problem, they help me. The people know me and are nice and welcoming. I feel like they are the best.
Because I know all the service, the people that work there. We're friends. We've been with them since we came to town. We even got our home loan with them. That's just where we bank. Because they feel like family. The greeter, they always know my name. They call to see if there is anything I need. If I call to transfer funds or anything, I think it's just that we know each other. I used to work in a bank. And I just think it's vital to have connection with your customers.
Because I like the tellers. They are so friendly, and make you feel so welcome. They make you feel like a mother, or a grandmother. They are all young people working there. They are interested in me as a person. They want to know how I am doing, how I am feeling, and all of that. They are very, very personable.
Because I like them a lot. They call me by name. I never have to wait.
Because I love the people. Because they are wonderful. They know their business.
Because I love their attention to detail. I just opened an account, and I was clueless about the online banking. They are nothing but helpful at every branch that I have called. I love the promptness. It's a joy to go in there. They are always smiling. They just make you feel welcome.
Because I never had any problems when I went there, and everybody knows me. They have respect, and they always call you by name.
Because I never had any trouble with them. They're all nice, they're very helpful, and they're kind.
Because I never have any problems when I go there. I just never have any problems.
Because I never have any problems with them, and they take care of any problems I have. They've been very good about taking care of our problems long distance. I like their online banking website.
Because I really like and enjoy MY BANK. I bought my house through MY BANK. They've answered all of my questions, and they've been there for me. When I walk into the building downtown, they acknowledge me. They know who I am. I also like doing business with them.
Because I was treated like a human being, not like a number. They were very interested on what we had to say, and they had great recommendations on what we should do with our money. It's not too far from where we live. There's always someone available when we need to make a deposit, or talk to somebody.
Because I was with Huntington, and I switched to MY BANK. My friend was the one that took me there. Polite, kids room to watch TV, snacks, coffee machine, and very courteous.
Because if I have a question, they always answer me, and sometimes they go out of the way to help me. Like a couple of years ago, I went overseas, and they were very helpful. Whenever I ask something, they always satisfy me.
Because if I use the drive-up, they know who I am. They are timely when I am in line. I am always satisfied. When MY BANK first took over, I had been with OTHER BANK for years. I like it better than OTHER BANK. They are always helpful and friendly. I am very satisfied there.
Because it's a good bank to work with, you know? They have candy for me.
Because it's absolutely the best. It speaks for itself.
Because it's my bank. Everyone up front is really good. If there is a problem, they are right on it. They look out for my well-being. I like it. All of the buildings look nice. The atmosphere is nice. They're prompt. You get in and get out.
Because it's still locally owned. I've been with them for many years, and they always have good service. They're consistent.
Because it's the best.
Because it's the only place I go to. Everybody at the bank knows everyone on a first name basis. Just everything all around.
Because it's very convenient for me, it's close by. No matter which teller I get they make me feel welcome.
Because I've always felt comfortable and they've always done everything for me. I have no problems with the bank at all. I just really feel comfortable. They are friendly, almost family atmosphere.
Because I've always had good service there. The people are very nice. They are good, and they do the job correctly. I just told you.
Because I've been with them a long time, I've made loans with them, and I've never had any problems, ever. They're very friendly. They seem very friendly. They genuinely seem happy to see you when you walk in. If they're not sincere, they put on a good act.
Because I've been with them since I was 14, and they've always been great with me, one-on-one at the tellers and desk, and you do great work with customers. I think it's just me being a loyal customer because that's the only thing I've ever known.
Because I've had absolutely zero issues or concerns about their honesty or sincerity in the way they conduct their business. I trust them. Every time I come in, they are friendly. They are smiling. They greet me. They take care of my banking, thank me, and do everything they can do for me.
Because I've had bad experiences with the others and they just don't seem to care. Here they seem to recognize me and know who I am. One of the tellers knows I'm legally blind, so when I walk in there she knows what I need, what I want, and she goes to it right away. She knows what accounts I have, and she asks me which one I want.
Because I've had nothing but good experiences with them. The people are friendly. They're knowledgeable, very helpful, and very polite.
Because I've had previous bad experiences with another bank, and that was several years ago. A friend recommended them and I have a home equity and checking. I just like the service. They've always treated me well. My mother banks there, she's a little elderly lady, and they've always been helpful to her, and that means a lot to me.
Because I've had some problems with other banks, I've been with MY BANK for many years. I really don't know how to answer that.
Because I've had such good service. People are nice, and I have no complaints. They answer the questions when I call in, and give me my balance when I call in.
Because I've never had a problem with them or anything. I think I was with Wells Fargo. They did some shady [omitted], like not cashing my check until whenever, so I had overdrafts with them. I've never had that problem with MY BANK. Every time you go in there, there is somebody to help you right off. There never seems to be a line. It doesn't eat up a lot of your lunch hour. I don't know. I went through a divorce, and I needed a lot of paperwork, because I just paid my ex-wife directly. I took money out of my account and put it directly into her account. The State said I didn't pay her. MY BANK gave me all of the paperwork to prove that I was paying her. That saved me a lot, in respect to the court battle and all that [omitted]. I nipped that in the bud.
Because I've never had a problem with them. If I do, like with my account, I can call or go in there, I have no issues. Like I said, we went through Fifth Third and it was awful.
Because I've never had a problem with them. They are friendly and courteous.
Because I've never had a problem with them. They've always been very courteous and very helpful. I've always been satisfied. They are a great bank.
Because I've never had a question or problem they couldn't handle. The way they treat people. It feel's friendly.
Because I've never had any problems with them. Everything is fine.
Because I've never had problems with them. I've been there for years. It is located right down the street at a very convenient place, and Martin's is a good grocery store. It's a double-bang for me. It just fits all my needs.
Because my wife and I had had some financial difficulties a few years ago, and they made us feel human. They worked with us to help us get back on our feet. The branch manager and the person downtown, who did the loan, did not look down at us. They went out of their way to help us secure that small loan. It's not so much MY BANK, as it is the people at the branch that I go to. I've been going to that branch for 25 years, before it was acquired by MY BANK, and they know you by name. When you go in there, they are never too busy to talk to you.
Because of all my answers. It's treated me real well. Location is good, and their hours are excellent.
Because of all the questions you asked me previously. I could easily go to another bank, but I won't. I like the people, and it's convenient.
Because of everything: customer service and friendliness, and I have never had any problem with them.
Because of my parents probably. We never have any problems.
Because of the convenience of the accounts as a college student. They insure I have the right kind of checking account. Knowing there are not many ATM's on campus, they allow me to waive three fees for the ATM's. When I went in I a had a different type account, but they switched me because of that.
Because of the convenience they are open till 7:00 at night and on Sunday from 12:00 to 3:00 and Franklin and Bristol Street are nice, too.
Because of the customer service and the satisfaction I get when I go in there. It doesn't seem like a very big organization, so when you make a call, you just talk to one person and get what you need to know.
Because of the customer service. In today's world, it's a dying art. I've been in business for a while, and they give old-school customer service. It's all about the customer. They treat you like a person. They are fast. If you have a problem, they get to the bottom of the problem. I just like the way they work.
Because of the dealings I have had with the top person at that location. I have had two others before. They know the answers, and how to get into the computers to get the information I need. They waste no time, and are accurate. I am old, and they are patient. If I don't understand something, I want to see it in black and white.
Because of the people there, they are so friendly. I have taken my account from another Bank and started a new account with this bank. They provide a personal experience every time.
Because of the people. They seem to know their business well, and are extremely helpful. I enjoy going into the bank. I have lived here four years, and have done business with other banks in different states. I find this bank on the top to do business with.
Because of the personnel, and the cleanliness and appearance of the building. The personnel are very professional. They know what they're doing. They're very courteous and polite. The people that work there, and the appearance of the bank. The overall attitude the personnel has towards the customers.
Because of the quick service. They are very friendly and helpful. We use them for our business, so we like them very much. I used to work there.
Because of the service I get. I have been there since the 70's. Sue helped and she is very good at her job.
Because of the service, and because I cannot compare to other banks, so I am satisfied. I use the service no problem. I don't know why else I would rate the bank absolutely the best.
Because of the service, even when I lived in Michigan. They try to work through everything with me, and I can't say I've been anywhere better except my daughters bank.
Because of the service. I've never had one problem with the bank whatsoever. They give very good service, and they are quick about it.
Because of the staff; they make you feel like you are welcome. Quick service; you don't have to wait.
Because of the way I'm treated there. Courteous. They've never caused me any grief.
Because of their courteous, kind, and prompt service they give me when I walk in there. Anytime I've ever had a question or a problem, they have been able to answer my question 100%. I know their answer is always right. That's the most I can tell you right now.
Because of their excellent customer service, very convenient, and clean. I am a loyal customer. They are very accurate, they went well beyond the call of duty.
Because of their friendliness, and the recognition. It's always clean and neat. When we need money, we don't have to wait for several days. They advise you on what to do. They greet you by name when you enter the bank.
Because of their personal relationship with me. They remember who I am, how many kids I have in the car and being very personalized with their customers. I like that they keep customer information proprietary and I appreciate the security they provide for us.
Because of their service, their kindness, and it is convenient for me. They don't charge you for every little thing. The bank I was with, even if you breathed, they would charge you. They charged me for things that they shouldn't have, I had to fuss with them, and I thought, Okay, I've had enough of this. Years ago, my husband and I lived here, and we moved away. He was in construction, and we banked with them when it used to be First Bank, and now it's MY BANK. We banked with them a long time until we moved away. When I came back, because he passed away, I don't know why I stayed as long as I did with this other bank. One day I had just had it. They give very good service, and like I said, it is convenient for me, too. They don't have a lot of charges that this other bank had.
Because of their service, they get right to it, you know they don't mess around. They're ready for you when you get there. Their manner, they're always happy, positive, good to you. Being prompt, greeting.
Because of what you said prior to this. They are efficient. They call me by name. They are familiar with what I need and want. The only complaint I have is that they need a drive-thru. Because I've been with them for so many years, even before they were MY BANK.
Because that is the only place at which I bank.
Because that's what it is. I've never had a problem with them. To me, they are the best.
Because that's what they are, fabulous.
Because that's where I feel the most comfortable with my banking. Because they know my name, and they pretty much know what I need when I get there.
Because the employees are very friendly and knowledgeable. The trainees are exceptional. I'm very happy with them. I feel very welcome and special when they call me by my first name. Excellent customer service.
Because the level of customer service, they know who we are. I actually have another account at another bank, and they joke around that they want the last account. I'm impressed that they remember that. I actually have my kids with MY BANK. They go above and beyond for my business. The atmosphere, the way the step-up is open. I feel like a person, not just a number. I'm actually impressed that they do their own customer surveys.
Because the people who work there are very open. I moved to this bank because I'm happy with the service. They inform me when they have specials, and if I want to add more to my assets, I do. The manager there; I hope he stays there forever. I just admire him. As I told you, the service is good, and they have options if I need anything. They inform me when they have special rates. They keep me informed, and that is what I need. That bank always informs me.
Because the service that Brett McHoffer and Bonnie Hobbs provide.
Because the services that they provide are everything that they can do. They are a bank and I am happy with it.
Because the way they treat you, they greet you. You don't have to have a big bank account, they're just nice to everybody. I just, like, I went in the other day. I haven't been in the new bank. They treat me like when I visited Walmart. Some banks don't recognize their customers. My son is going to open a bank account. They gave him good answers. What else can I say about them? Overall, they're just a good bank to go to. I've had a lot of banks over my 67 years, and MY BANK is the first I can say I like.
Because their customer service skills are the best. I have banked at other banks before. They don't give me the customer service that MY BANK gives me. The second I walk into the branch, they greet me. There is no waiting. I get in there, I get what I need, and I'm out in five minutes max.
Because their tellers are very helpful and courteous. It seems like I get a young lady named Carrie. She's very sincere and courteous. The girls over there are so nice and treat me so well. I would never switch from MY BANK because of the customer service at Waynedale. It's a little out of my way, but I still wouldn't switch banks because of those girls. They really deserve a pat on the back or an award. I've been banking with them for a long time, and I've never had a problem there. Carrie treats me with some personal caring and consideration; they all are just caring. I'm not wealthy, but I think they would treat me the same as someone who is. They take my banking seriously. I wouldn't be surprised if I didn't get all excellent throughout the surveys.
Because they always know you by name and always able to get what you need done in a timely fashion. If one of the other tellers is new, there is another more experienced teller willing to help, so you can get out of there in good time.
Because they are a lot better. The way stuff is handled and treated is a lot better. It is a lot more professional.
Because they are always courteous to everyone. I grew up in Kentucky and Indiana, so I expect to be treated nicely. You can ask them anything about the bank, and if they don't know the answer, they will get someone who can answer. They greet you by name when you walk in, and if you are waiting, someone will come from the back counter to help you. They make you feel like they want you at the bank, and they treat you with absolute respect. They call you by name, they will help you, and they are just very polite. If they see you in the store, they wave. They are always so nice. I know they have to deal with some very difficult people. One of them, a sibling of mine, yells at them, but they are so nice and kind to her. I want to take her outside and whoop her for that. She is very disrespectful, yet they treat her like a little princess. If you can treat someone who is as horrible as she is, you are good!
Because they are always prompt and getting back to me. Always helping me, and I was working with Erica, she was so very helpful and took the extra time to make sure that I understood the issue that I asked her about.
Because they are always very nice and willing to help you when you go in. They always answer your questions with no doubt at all.
Because they are always very polite and personal. Ask a question and they always answer even if it's a personal question. Never had any problem, very polite.
Because they are courteous and helpful. They help me any way they can. Their behavior is wonderful whether I go in or go through the drive-thru.
Because they are friendly and fast.
Because they are friendly and nice.
Because they are friendly. They've been very quick, and I don't have to wait. They are very accurate. The people are always kind.
Because they are kind. Because I'm old, and they acknowledge me. They know my dog's name. This branch is my favorite, but they're all good. I have a cane, and they suggested that I use an easier way to come in. They suggested that to me. I didn't know it was there.  When I had my surgery, I was not able to go to the bank. I made arrangements to have all the business taken care of. They went out of their way to help me.
Because they are open on Sundays. The people are very friendly. I feel welcome there. The convenience factor.
Because they are so on top of stuff and very organized.
Because they are very friendly. They also are welcome to help you out if you have a question about something.
Because they are very helpful. They sorted out the situation for me. Also, they are friendly.
Because they are.
Because they are. All of my answers indicate why.
Because they are. Because of the service we receive.
Because they are. Because they are the best. The way they handle our account, and the way we're treated when we're in there.
Because they are. I have dealt with them for a long time. They held the door open for me when I left.
Because they are. I think they are, anyways.
Because they are. The service is good, the people are friendly, and it's nice on the inside. Their service is very good. They say your name, they're prompt about things, and they are overly friendly.
Because they come to me when I walk in the door. They help me see the screen, and what they type in on the screen. Everything is very organized when I walk in. Everyone is dressed appropriately.
Because they give me the proper attention, they are respectful, always a good morning and How are you today? Very friendly. They have my best interest at heart. I never have a bad feeling going in or even when I leave.
Because they go above and beyond what's required, they're very, very friendly. I think they're a smaller branch, and because they're smaller, you know them better than a larger branch. I used to live in South Bend, and I went to all different branches because I was driving all over; I guess that's probably why I didn't get to know them as well. They're very personable. They ask if you want a cup of coffee, if the water's cold. And it doesn't happen often, but I have trouble with walking, and if there are a couple of people in line, they will ask me if I need to sit.
Because they greet me by name. They treat me like a person, not a number. I don't like online banking, or drive-thrus. I deal with bankers in person. I don't know how they do it; they greet me every time I come in the door. I could not believe it, the second trip there. It's amazing. A fantastic place. I like the downtown branch as well. Personally, I don't believe in debit cards. I guess I am just too old-fashioned. There's just too much fraud going on. I like to do my banking face-to-face. I use checks. I like the way that MY BANK operates, and like doing my banking there very much. They seem to be one of the most personable businesses that I do business with, and are professional and friendly.
Because they have always taken care of me.
Because they have always treated me very good, and they've always made good loans for me. If I have any problems, there is always someone there to solve it, and if I have any questions, someone is always there.
Because they have always treated us very well. They are friendly.
Because they have good customer service. They just make you feel very welcome. They know your name when you walk in. It's nice to get called out by name.
Because they have great service, and help me with my problems and banking needs. I've never had a problem with them.
Because they know me and I've been with them for years.
Because they know me by name, and they're comfortable. Just by knowing my name, being quick, not asking a bunch of questions other than the one's they're supposed to. It's just what I'm used to, I guess.
Because they know me personally. I would like to see better interest rates.
Because they know me personally. They address me by name, and they treat me like a real person. They handle my loan transactions. I've had no problems with them, and I've been banking with them for five years now.
Because they know their customers. They check identification, so they're thorough. And they have always answered my questions very promptly, and they're more than willing to help me out with anything I need to know.
Because they know you by name when you walk in, do anything to help you.
Because they pay attention to you, and they listen to you. They get right to the point, and you're out of there. You never have a long wait.
Because they provide excellent service to myself and my clients. Because they are really courteous.
Because they treat me like an actual customer instead of another number. Because every time I walk in, they know my first name.
Because they treat me really well.
Because they treat me with respect. They know my name. The people are outstanding. They treat me with respect. I don't know. I go in there, and they know my name, and they already have my account set-up. I just tell them what I need, and they give it to me. Everybody who works there is outstanding. Every girl in there is cool; they have got it down! They are very helpful, very respectful, and very business-like.
Because they treated me very well. For me to be a new customer they did everything they needed and everything I wanted. Because of their treatment, they treated me very well.
Because they were very nice and kind. They were very pleasant to deal with. They have nice, young girls in there. I had no problems whatsoever.
Because they’re always polite, they always take care of all of my questions, and I never had any problems. I've recommended them to several different businesses and my family members. Because they’re very friendly and care about what you need. They’re very helpful.
Because they're always friendly. I have had no problems with my account and no mess-ups. It's just nice, smooth business. They're always friendly when I come in. They take good care of me. It's just a really good atmosphere.
Because they're good people to go to. They help you out. I don't know, it's a bank.
Because they're personal with everyone, very attentive and they treat their customers like their friend. Because they're good with their customers.
Because they're the best bank out there. They're great. They just have good service.
Because they're very courteous at all times and at all branches that I go to, for myself only. They listen to their customers very well, and they're very pleasant. They're very caring when it comes to money matters and their greetings. They're very honest, and they always make you feel good to come back with anything if you need to come back. It's with every branch. That's for me. I've heard other people say they're good too.
Because they're very friendly, prompt service when you go in, and they greet you, like they know you're there. They greet you. They open up at 7:00 a.m. which is excellent.
Because they're very personable and always willing to help me. I have had great service from them. I just have never had any problems.
Because they've always been good as far as answering questions, and as far as changing accounts. The customer service is always good.
Because they've always treated me with respect, and it's also convenient.
Because they've been a good bank, and also they've always been there to help me.
Because they've been my bank for years and years. I know everyone there, so they treat me like family.
Because they've gone out of their way to treat me in the best way. They offer every service I need.
Because very fast and efficient, and it's really good.
Because we always get excellent service there, and everyone is friendly, that's why we recommend them. We've banked at other banks, and they are the best bank we've ever banked at.
Because we have other accounts in other banks. One account is with Chase Bank, and they do not seem to care that we have banked with them for a long time. So, we plan on transferring all of our accounts over to MY BANK.
Because we've never had a bit of trouble, and they've kept up the service for years. They give the best service.
Because we've never had any problems with you. We've always been able to call, and any time we ask them anything, they've always been able to answer our questions.
Because when I first walk in, they always make me feel welcome. They are very nice. The overall performance of the bank. Just the way I am in and out if I am in a rush.
Because when we go in there, they know our name. They are friendly, neat, clean, and there are no long waits.
Because when you come in there, they call you by name. I'm not a number. They know who I am. When they transact business, they know what they're doing. They're well trained. Customer service is top. They're always looking out to help you out. The only place I know to get coffee. I can use the internet when I go in there.
Because, I'm comfortable and I am friends with all the girls. We just laugh and have a good time, every time I go in. I like to tease them. I don't just think of them as tellers, to me they are my friends. I would feel very comfortable talking about anything with them, and I have. I think they know my whole family history!  Because, I think at my age, I'm not young, I've been at other banks, and was never comfortable. We have been with MY BANK a long time. I don't trust other banks. I trust MY BANK.
Because, I've been at other banks, and I feel like it is the best in the way that they treat you. Everyone is very nice and courteous.
Because, I've never had any trouble whatsoever with them. They've always done an excellent job. They meet my needs, and I don't need to pay for checking accounts. I'm so very happy with them. If my checking doesn't balance, they're very patient with me and go through it with me. They are always willing to help.
Been with them for years. Like the way they greet you, and the music!
Been with them since '94. Friendly and accommodating. Know my first name, and no problems with them whatsoever. They welcome me, and often say my first name. They meet all my banking needs.
Best service, overall experience with a bank period. Know who I am. Know my name. My life experiences. They ask how my day is. Have a good weekend. People. Very personable. Enjoy their job.
Better in personal service. They check in to see if I need anything.
Closest thing I have to a family that's a business, that I have to do business with. I've felt comfortable staying at the bank for a long time. Jamie that works at the counter makes me want to come back. I never dread going in there. Even if my account is out of whack they help me out with everything.
Courteous; they greet you by name. They apologize if you have to wait in line for a minute. They take time to answer questions you have. They have never made mistakes. The people that work there. I've checked around, and decided to stay with MY BANK. They follow through.
Customer appearance. I bank with them all the time. Overall friendly. I love them.
Customer service is great. They are always polite. They know who I am. They call me by my name. It's just a really great atmosphere. You guys got a checking account. It's the paperless so you don't have to keep money in it. Most banks charge you. Customer service. Kind of a bank that makes you feel at home. A friendly atmosphere. Good rapport. My girlfriend told me to switch banks[COMMA and I finally did.
Customer service was outstanding.
Customer service, friendliness, and attention to detail. There have been times when they have called about a problem we didn't know about. A lot of times they come out from behind the counter and greet. They are friendly, nice people, and they seem more like friends than just going to the bank. They offer tea, coffee, and cookies. I also like that you can make copies on the machine. A lot of attention to detail and personal attention. That is nice.
Customer service.
Customer service. 100% customer service.
Customer service. The people that work there. They acknowledge you when you come in. They are very sincere. Just all the questions you asked me. If I need anything, they have always addressed it, and they go out of their way to help. The hours they are open. They are open seven days, and the online banking is good, and I have nothing bad to say.
Customer service; the interaction, and the feedback.
Easy to get along with.
Eric. I found his service to be exceptional, and we had a good discussion about my financial needs. He was listening well, and in the end, I was satisfied with the results. He was professional. I wouldn't hesitate to see Eric again for any banking needs.
Every clerk that I've dealt with has always been courteous, respectful, and polite. She was very, very knowledgeable. They're always so friendly.
Every employee at that branch, well, I've been there for five years now. I know everybody. We laugh, we joke, we cut up. It's like everybody's family. Well, they just all have pretty good personalities. I've stood in line while other customers are there, and when you walk in, they ask how you are. They make a point to know. It's not just one teller, it's all the tellers, even the branch manager. He's an awesome guy. They go the extra mile for you over there. That's pretty much about it. I haven't had any problems with my accounts. If there is a problem, they handle it very quickly. I have a home equity line through MY BANK. The manager took me through everything. I have no problems whatsoever with my bank!
Every employee over there is above excellent. Always willing to help, and always friendly.
Every time I deal with them. Friendly. Pleasant. In and out service.
Every time I go in there they are professional, they smile, are happy, dress nicely, and they know their business. They explain things and are very helpful. I think it is the finest bank staff in country!
Every time I go in there, I get along with everybody pretty well. They all know my name and I know theirs, except the new girl. It's nice to go in and be able to joke around with the people. Usually, it's fast and easy, and they get everything taken care of.
Every time I go in there, I get excellent service. I like that. I walk in, and they take care of me right away. I don't have to wait. They're kind and friendly. I have no problems with anything when I'm there. I'm really satisfied with their service, and they've always done well since I started doing business with them.
Every time I go in there, they're very friendly, and I can't think of anything bad about them.
Every time I go in, they say my name. We have had five bank accounts from them, and two car loans. No issues. They are very helpful. Because of the personal service. I can walk in and talk to the bank manager whenever I want. I like the personal service. Excellent car rates.
Every time I go there, everyone knows me by name, know what they're doing, and answer my questions.
Every time I go there, everything goes smoothly. People treat me well, and I never have any problems or issues. I don't know, it's just been a good bank to me since I've been there.
Every time I go there, they know my name as soon as I walk in. Just their mannerisms, and their professionalism. Money-wise, they always do what they say they are going to do. They answer my questions.
Every time I go, it's uplifting and I have had no problems compared to other companies. I feel good when I come out. The manger is a sweet heart. Bank of America's not as personable and not as caring as MY BANK. They have always been that way. Personable, caring and treated me very nicely. They greet me by name, ask how day is going and if I say something, they remember and ask me question. They laugh, they pay attention to what's going on with the individual and not a lot of places do that. And I always like the way we were treated. It's small, good location, and not that far from home. Very happy for quite a while. Can't say enough great there.
Every time I have a question, it is addressed with sincerity. If they do not have an immediate answer, they get it and reply back. They are friendly, and they work hard to help me with anything. They are a good group, because of everything they do for us.
Every time I have gone in there, they have been polite and helpful. They have taken the liberty of getting to know me and my family by name. They are always efficient and fast. I'm always in and out in a timely matter.
Every time I have gone in, it has been clean. They offer cookies and coffee. The employees are sweet. They know me by my first name, especially in this branch. They always wave when I leave, and they are friendly. The tellers are very personable. They do remember your name. I feel that they are doing a top-notch job compared to others, like any other credit union or place where they don't remember your name, and you are just another person in line.
Every time I have needed something, or went in for a loan, they did everything they could for me. I am very pleased with the bank. I have had other issues with other banks. They weren't very nice, and they didn't go out of their way to help me.
Every time I've gone in there, they've solved all of my problems. They take care of my problems.
Every time we need anything there always right on top of it. Great customer service. Friendly, knowledgeable, just very, very helpful.
Everybody helps me out with everything I need. I have never had any issues. They are prompt, and it's a good place to do business.
Everybody in the bank is very friendly and they are always willing to help. They are just a great group of people. Everyone is very knowledgeable.
Everybody was very friendly, and it was clean and nice. The customer service was good. They addressed all my needs and everything.
Everyone is very pleasant, and I have no complaints. I never have to wait in long lines, they know my name, it's a great experience.
Everyone there is very courteous, helpful and efficient.
Everything has been good. When they called me I had a medical surgery. That's how I got the loan. I was amazed at how friendly they were, how adequate, and how short of a time it took. Basically because of the service I got. We had some financial problems, and we ended up losing our business. And when I had back surgery, they told us we'll get you approved through the bank. You folks were very good. That's why I would definitely open up another account with you.
Everything I need, they take care of right then and there. Answer all my questions. Never had any issues. I know everybody that works in this branch too; I went to school with some of them. We've become friends over the years.
Everything that we've dealt with them the last three or fourth months, they have gone beyond to try and satisfy us and get our questions answered. It's pleasant to go in and talk to them. We've just enjoyed talking with different people like the mortgage and checking people.
Everything they have, from going to the ATM, it's close to home, no fees for checking accounts, their drive-thru hours are good, all that stuff. They're very helpful. They re-did the banks in town and they're very nice.
Everything went smoothly. The customer service is better there than anywhere else. All of my questions were answered. They went out of their way to help me.
Everything, overall. They know who you are. They're courteous. It's neat and tidy there. You don't have to wait very long. I've dealt with a lot of other banks, and they weren't nearly as good.
Excellent customer service, very convenient. They've added more to satisfy the customer. Very professional. Clean atmosphere and prompt service.
Excellent customer service. Friendly nature.
Excellent customer service. I have customer service and it's offered at MY BANK. Well, it's the only one I go and very welcoming and answering any questions, I can't compare it to any branch, it's the only one I go to.
Excellent service.
Excellent service. Very friendly, very accurate. That's it.
Excellent. I recommend them to others. Customer service takes care of whatever problems you have.
Exceptional customer service. Adam Hensen, Brent Mithoefer, and Bonnie Hobbs have all given exceptional customer service. They are willing to help. They look at the whole financial picture. They get things done, and they don't dilly dally. They are willing to take the time to understand my needs.
First of all, they are attentive. Our son passed away last year, and the branch manager worked with my wife many years ago. She helped us get all of our son's funds back to us, and she was very helpful. They have taken good care of us. We used to do business on Coldwater Road, but the manager retired. But they were very good. They helped me get a car loan without many penalties. They don't charge too many miscellaneous charges. I have had a bank account for 30 years, and we have never been charged any fees.
For a small town everyone knows your name. Always on the ball, I'm in and out. They make you feel like family.
For all the reasons I've just given, and all of the questions you just asked. The service has been great, the people have been great. As much as I like the bank, I don't like the survey. I think it is a great bank. It was recommended to me by my sister. All of my experiences have been positive.
For all the reasons you gave me.
For Notre Dame students, it's the absolute bank of choice. It's accessible. You feel remembered and they are very clear on all charges. I've never had any problems with it. That's about it.
For one I love it. I love going to the grocery store, and they are right there. That's the greatest thing ever. All the people get to know you. They you they are great people. They just do a good job. They are very good. They are very nice people.
For one thing, I like it when I call, and a person actually answers. I like it when I walk in, and they say, Hey, Loretta. I like when I ask them for something, and they try to do it for me. They're friendly people. I like the tellers, I like the managers. l like the service. I like that they do things for other people, and for the community. They have a box inside, and they collect for eyeglasses for the Lions Club. They had blankets, and the other one was for the Fire Department. They care about the community.
For starters, it seems like I can basically go in there and get a loan on anything I want. You guys give me a great APR. I have loans with Capital One. I refinanced with you guys after getting a car, and I went from a 7.9% to a 2.99%. You saved me thousands of dollars. I have to rate you the best. With my financial situation right now, I feel like you guys are taking care of me. I've been with you guys for so long, I feel comfortable with you.
Friendliness of the people at the branch. A lot of them recognize me by name when I go in. They totally redid the interior.
Friendliness, accuracy, and I've had no problem in any way, shape, or form with any of my transactions. I've banked with them since 2007. I don't know what else to say to be honest with you.
Friendly atmosphere. They know me.
Friendly customer service. They remember my name. Accuracy, 100% accuracy. I've just never had any problems with them.
Friendly service and excellent capabilities. They do a good job.
Friendly service. They are always polite. They call me by name. They know who I am when I walk in the door.
From everything I have experienced I've never had issues. I've been completely satisfied with everything. I haven't had any problems. I like it.
From past experience. We have been dealing with MY BANK and have been very happy. Satisfied with the customer service we get every time we go.
From the first time I went there, they were very friendly and very helpful. Ashley and Nicole.
From the personnel. The tellers are really nice and always quick. They call me by name.
Great experience. Side by side can. Friendly. Lobby is good. Coffee and cookies. Kids love it.
Great job. They know me. I see them and they know me. We are all on a first name basis.
Great location, very accessible, and close to my home. They have great people there. The customer service is amazing. Great customer service.
Great service, kind service.
Handled me right away. Don't take too long. No negative experience. No problems.
Have been more satisfied at MY BANK than any bank I've ever been with. They are very personalized.
Have had problems with other banks.
Her name was Velma. She was the teller, and she was very cheerful and professional. And she knew my name. Also, it's a clean place. Except one thing. They took the branch closest to my house, so that was one bad thing. So now I don't have a branch as close to my house, but I go downtown now mostly.
I also have another bank I deal bank with, and MY BANK goes above and beyond. They have a good crew and manager. When I needed their help and needed it to be done immediately, they helped yesterday, and it went quickly and I needed it. I even got calls from the manager to see when I would be in. It went quickly. The manager's name is spelled Jesus, and he is very, very good at what he does. They are a bank that knows what to do and what the customer needs, and they took they stress off of me, and that's what I needed. I needed a computer to use, and Jesus had me come in and use their computer. They had a teller help me, and we got it done.
I always feel welcome, and I feel like they know me. They call me by name, they ask about my daycare. They are personal, and they do it with everyone. As I'm standing, I hear, Hey Bill, and I like that. Their service is great, and I've never had problems.
I am satisfied with their service. They are friendly, and it's a good place to do business. I've been with them for years and years. Their people are very nice.
I am satisfied. I was satisfied with their service. I am satisfied.
I am very happy with them. They have been kind to me since day one. MY BANK is where I got my house from, my mortgage, and everything is through them. I have had excellent customer service.
I bank with more than one institution, and it seems there is always someone available to answer my question, and I don't have to wait for a call back to get a response. Great customer service, availability of ATMs, bank rates, and mortgage rates. I have my mortgage with them as well.
I banked with two other banks before, and I wasn't pleased with the experience I had. I haven't had any negative experiences with MY BANK that I had before. I always felt like they treated me like a person instead of a number. It's convenient. There are several locations in Fort Wayne. I have one close to the place where I reside, and they have one in Lafayette where I visit.
I can accomplish what I need to accomplish, quickly and efficiently.
I can honestly say the Dupont branch and Cold Water branch[COMMA are very helpful. They told me about other services. I have two other teenagers; the bank is very helpful setting up their accounts. They were very encouraging when I lost my job. Help me manage my account.
I changed banks about three years ago. I went across street to MY BANK, and was greeted very warmly and treated very well. I had some payments made automatically. I can't brag about my computer expertise. I was helped with that. I have gotten to know two or three tellers personally. I wouldn't use the drive-up, not because the service is not good, but I prefer personal interaction.
I come in there, and there's no wait. They're friendly. They are the best.
I consider it a home-town bank, and I do not like big, chain-type banks, like Chase, and whatever the rest are. Everyone knows who you are. They talk to you, and they just help everybody. I've had problems years and years ago with a large bank, and I will not go back to one. I don't have any problems with them, they are great. They know you, and they are friendly, no matter which branch you go to. I like it that when I go out of town to visit my kids, I can make three withdrawals from a non-MY BANK ATM, and they will reimburse me the fees from the ATMs.
I deal with them enough. They already know my name, and everybody is friendly. They make sure you get what you need, and if I have any problems, they fix it.
I dealt with another bank before and they are not as good as MY BANK. The service is friendly, their willingness to help me, and they are always there. I had a particular credit union account for 25 years, and I wanted to pay off the house I have, and they wouldn't let me. I asked them at MY BANK and they helped me, and I've stayed with them ever since.
I don't have a problem at that office. They all know me. I take my son there. They take care of whatever I need to have done. They answer all of my questions, so I don't have a problem.
I don't have a problem with them at all.
I don't have any problems with them.
I don't know. I just like to go there. I like the friendliness. When you go in, they say, Hi, how are you? They greet you by name. I don't know. I've just never had a bad experience. I just like banking with them.
I don't know. I think that it's just the way it's so personal when you walk in, and they get to know you and know who you are. I don't know. I just like them.
I feel like family friendly, and I feel very comfortable. They work with me on a first name basis. They are wonderful people. I can walk over and see what is in my account, and they don't even need my name. With my last bank, I just felt like a number. I don't feel like that with MY BANK. Shaila and Ericka are wonderful managers.
I feel like they are a good family bank. I do not feel like an ordinary person. I know all the bankers by name, and it feels like a family bank, not a big organization. Plus they give my dog a treat. I think they are fast and proficient. When you have an issue, they are fast to resolve it. I had an issue over three months ago, so I did answer your question correctly, but they resolved an issue on a deposit where my transaction and another person’s transaction skipped and was not recorded. They were fast in getting it fixed and making calls about it to me.
I feel like they like me. I've been with other banks that had a lot of fees, and they made things more complicated than they needed to be. I appreciate that MY BANK doesn't do that. I have been with them for a long time. I know a lot of the people, and they seem very inviting. Other banks have made mistakes. MY BANK seems accurate.
I feel very comfortable going in there. I usually go to the ATM and withdraw money, then go to the counter to deposit it. If they don't have a customer they always speak with you. They are very pleasant. The personal service they give. They don't tell you to hold on a second, they take care of you. If the phone is ringing they don't tell you to hold on. They take care of you first, and then answer the phone.
I get excellent care, I think.
I get friendly banking service.
I get personal service. They recognize me as soon as drive in, or walk to the window. They're convenient. They just remodeled. I'm just happy with them. They're like two blocks from my house.
I get phenomenally professional service every time I go in. They set the standard for banks, as far as I'm concerned.
I get very good service every time. They are friendly and fast. They do what I need done. I like the employees.
I get what I want done, and I don't have any problems.
I go there, because they remember me. They are just super to work with. I am sad that Anisha is leaving to go to another branch, but I am sure you'll get someone just as nice. I have never had an issue with fraud. I get the best service from MY BANK. They've helped me through some really difficult things. They are so personable and helpful. They guide me through things.
I guess, in my experience, I am almost 75 years old. When I first walked into MY BANK; in the last 40 years, I hadn't been treated the way that they treated me. It was like I walked into a bank that I just did business with. I felt extremely comfortable. I would say it was the most friendly, customer-caring bank I'd been in, in a long time. They're straight-shooters. It's like, when you go in, they go out of their way to make sure you are taken care of.
I had all my loans, checking account, home equity, mortgage and never been denied what I ask for. I transfer money and I am very easy to do that. Everything is excellent. My finance of 19 years banks there too and we have a very good relationship. They are always friendly willing to do what I ask. I follow their progress in the paper and how they treat other banks. 
I had an issue, and they took care of it immediately. They just take good care of me.
I had other banks. I just love them. And they're open on Sunday. My son in law is a truck driver and loves that they are open on Sunday.
I have a handicapped daughter. They help us, and they help her count her money. Very personal. They are the best.
I have a personal account, and my company banks there. They know me by name, and they greet me by name. They are all very friendly. I'm the manager of a gas station. I like greeting people by name, and I like it in return. I've had other banks in the past that wouldn't work with me like MY BANK does. They had attitudes with me.
I have always had excellent service; very friendly and they know what they are doing. The convenience, I like up here in Michigan there are many branches, so I don't have to go far to find one.
I have always had good service, and they are very professional.
I have always had good service. No problems. They're always friendly, and they have always been able to answer any questions I may have.
I have banked there for a long time, and I know about every teller's name. It's just a wonderful bank to bank with. Because they are friendly, and I see a lot of the customers that like them too. They are just so friendly.
I have banked there for a long time. They are very friendly, and are good about calling if there are any problems. If something on my account seems to not be normal, they will call me.
I have banked there for a very long time, and I am very satisfied with the service.
I have been a customer ever since they were a different bank.
I have been a customer there for, gosh, I don't even know how long. I never even had a problem, and even when I did, they always resolved the issue to my satisfaction. Because they treat me like a family member, not just like a number, or a nobody walking through the door. They call me by name, and I get excellent service there.
I have been a lot of places, and they are the friendliest, and the best at their business.
I have been banking there since 1987. The employees are very friendly, and they know your name. I've never felt dissatisfied or unhappy when I've left. They have been excellent. I had a problem with a check, and they were very quick to take care of it. I have been to other banks and people tend to be rude.
I have been banking with them for a long time. They call me by my first name. They are very nice. They are very helpful, and they are just very nice people.
I have been there for nine years. They are always friendly, and they are quick to know your name. Very professional. I have never had any trouble with my account. I like there is no charge on how many times you use your debit card. Other banks charge. I use mine a lot.
I have been to other banks, and I don't care for them. I know some of the people there, and I feel like family. Their service, and if I have a problem, they call me. Banking; the way it should be.
I have been treated with respect and had no problems with this bank. The girls and guys are awesome, they all call me by name, and they show me respect.
I have been with MY BANK for a year now. I have been to a lot of different banks all over town. I've never been treated the way that MY BANK treats me.
I have been with four other banks. However, MY BANK causes me no concern. They pay attention to my problems.
I have been with them for many years, and I would never go to another bank. The people are very caring. I have gotten myself into trouble with my account, and they always bend over backwards to help me. I adore them, and they are excellent. I think they just care about their customers.
I have dealt with MY BANK for a long time. They opened the branch in Martin's. It's only two miles from my home. My first experience was when I opened my safety deposit box in Granger. This one is close to my house. They are excellent people. It's like going in and talking to my family. They bent over backwards to get me what I needed when I had to put my wife in a nursing home. Because they are the best. I switched all of my insurance to MY BANK. It's the best thing I ever did.
I have done business there for over 26 years and have always had good, considerate help. The personnel are not only efficient, but pleasant. Old fashioned pleasant, like friendly passing of time with just a few words, instead of just have a good day. They don't seem to be mechanical.
I have done business with other banks in town, and I like MY BANK the best.
I have had no problems with them. That's the kind of service I get: 100%.
I have had nothing, but good service from them. Better than a lot of other banks I've been with. The atmosphere; the kindness. They talk to you by name, like a family. I used other banks in town and am not satisfied with any of them.
I have had reason to experience that which is not good. MY BANK is good and friendly. They always welcome me. They were so patient in helping me with the online process. They had the foresight to update their building for safety.
I have had some problems and they have helped in the past. When I walk in there, they know me by name and always are very friendly.
I have just been very pleased. I've been a customer for years, and I've been very pleased with them.
I have my business accounts there. The quality of service is good. I am comfortable with the bank. The relationship I have with the bankers is super. I am glad this location is open. It is convenient for me.
I have never had a bad experience. Their security is very good. I had a case where I put the wrong PIN number in, and I had to ask them to unlock it. My mother was banking with them, and they were very cooperative with us in helping with her banking.
I have never had a problem in years. They know who you are. They have fantastic service.
I have never had a problem with them. Any questions I've asked they've answered clearly. Their customer service is really good. They ask me how my day is, and we have a friendly conversation.
I have never had a problem with them. They are a good bank to me.
I have never had a problem with them. They got right on what I have told them to do. I would not go anywhere else.
I have never had a problem. I have always been treated good. I have never had a problem. I have come in and I only wait a couple of minutes. I am not sure.
I have never had a problem. They are very friendly. They always speak to you, every time you walk through the door. I have no complaints. They are everything that a bank should be. They make you feel welcome, as soon as you walk in the door.
I have never had an issue. I have never had a problem. I've always had friendly people to deal with. I think that one of the reasons I chose to go, there is little or no fees; I always like that.
I have never had any issues, and they have been real helpful. I went in to talk about a car loan, and she was real sweet and took a personal interest. Usually they are like that. They know me personally.
I have never had any problems. They are very personable. I know them all by name and they know me. I am comfortable with them.
I have never had any problems. They have always treated me right.
I have never had any trouble with them. I have never had problems. They have always been really helpful when my husband died they helped me with all my accounts.
I have never had one problem with them in the past four years I've been there. They answer every question I've had, and have been right there. I like the attitude, and I like the people. All of them address you by name, not just the tellers. They all know who I am.
I have not been dissatisfied with any transaction I've had with MY BANK. Just their all-around professionalism. It's a nice local bank. The tellers know me. They know my name, and I don't have to show an ID, or any form of identification.
I have not had a problem at all since I joined MY BANK. Excellent service. They call me by my first name and so forth when I walk into Martin's. They say hi, and there's very good service. I'm a veteran, and I understand it very well.
I have two or three banks and they have most of my money. I'm an old man and they treat me with respect and let me know what I need to know.
I have worked at a bank, and I know what to expect. They do everything there for me with a smile, and I have no problems. Well, because they are.
I haven't ever had any problems, and the customer service has always been great.
I haven't had any interactions with any other bank. It has been convenient for my services on campus, and I haven't had any problems. It is convenient for my uses as a student; the locations and the ATMs as well.
I haven't had any issues with them. They do everything I ask. I can't think of any way they can improve.
I haven't had any trouble at all. Very helpful. It's a good location for me.
I just feel very comfortable, and I get excellent care. The manager always greets me, comes to the teller window, and talks to me. I've known him for some time, and the tellers are so friendly.
I just have been a member there for years, and I have hardly had any problems. They are friendly, and they expanded the amount of locations, which is more convenient.
I just have not had a bad experience. Everyone is always so friendly, especially at the Elkhart North Martin's branch. I appreciate being recognized and being helped. They always go above and beyond. They all deserve a raise. They address me by my name, and they help me fill out the slips. I always feel very welcome. The hours. I appreciate the hours. They're open evenings and Saturdays. Always very helpful to me. That location is convenient, and I am always able to reach someone and get the help that I need.
I just like everything. I've been there for years. They are courteous. They are helpful in taking care of my account, and all of the different transactions that I need. I appreciate it.
I just like the personal attention, and answers to my questions. I know them by first names.
I just really like the atmosphere, the promptness, and the professionalism. They make you feel at home. I think in today's world, it's rare you're treated that way. I really appreciate how they treat their customers. I have never had any issues with them, like I have with other banks in the past. If there's an issue that comes up, just like recently my wife misplaced her debit card, they are happy and punctual to help with that. Those are some of the reasons why I rate them 100 percent.
I know my personal banker very well, I've known her for 50 years because we grew up together. I like everybody there and the products they have. I just like the attention they give us.
I know the girls in there, so they're always personable. Friendly environment, and they always have coffee.
I know the people there. I do all of my business at MY BANK, so I know them. I've dealt with a lot of banks. Obviously, they are the best, and they have the best rates. They are nice, and they always return my phone calls. It doesn't get any better than that. That's it.
I like all the girls down there, they are just friendly. The girls are always good when I go in there.
I like Cari West. Convenient location.
I like going in there. I like the way they treat me. I find it a very good bank to do business with.
I like it, that’s all.
I like my bank. They know me by name. They've always been helpful. I have two daughters, and they always give suckers to my daughters every time I come through.
I like the atmosphere. I always go inside. They make me feel welcome. Overall the people are so friendly. They act like they know you and are overly friendly. They make feel welcome.
I like the availability of the branch, and that it is open on Saturdays and Sundays. The tellers are very friendly. I don't ever have to wait to get my banking done.
I like the bank. They do very nice business. They are very helpful. Very convenient. If you have a need for insurance or anything, they will come see you.
I like the drive-thru, and everyone seems very friendly. Sometimes I'm in a hurry and have to use the drive-thru.
I like the location. I like most of the people in there.
I like the people there. They are very professional, and they treat me well. They are very polite and courteous.
I like the personnel there and actually know some quite well. I like going there. They seem very good at what they do.
I like the service. They treat you properly. They will help you any way they can.
I like the way the teller treated me, the atmosphere, and the way the sun shone through the window. Everybody was happy. No one was glum. I was very pleased. We have never had any banking procedure problems.
I like the way they treated me and answered all of my questions.
I like their customer service. They answer my questions when I call, in very polite, not rude ways like other banks; like Wells Fargo. They are rude, stuck-up, and make you feel two feet tall when you walk in. At MY BANK, they try to remember you and your name. I've never had a problem with them.
I like them a lot. They have always done a good job for me. I have never had a problem and have always been satisfied.
I like them. I haven't had any problems. You pretty much named them all. I like everything about them. I used to go to Regional Federal, and then I switched. I haven't had any problems.
I like them. They are alright people. They remember your name. When I need help, they help me.
I love MY BANK. I have been there for 20 years. This is a new branch to me, but they know me, and they know my kids. They ask about my vacations and accounts. They are very friendly and wonderful.
I love it. They know how to talk to a person just right to solve things that you got going. The interior is great, and the atmosphere is great. Everything is.
I love the fact that you can go around the counter now and I really appreciate that. It makes me feel safer with my information.
I love the girls there. They have great hearts and personalities. You couldn't ask for a better group of ladies to represent MY BANK, than them. Excellent service, and excellent respect.
I love the service I received.
I love the service. They're pretty good with their business. They are very organized. The way they treat their customers.
I love them. I've always loved them. They are friendly. They are close by, and accessible. They are accurate and efficient.
I moved from a different banking institution due to issues of them not serving my needs on one-on-one personal banking. Moved to MY BANK through recommendation of a family member, and they help me all the way. Certain banks have different protocols, and I didn't have to wait as long. The atmosphere was really great. Have not been to a bank that was as open as welcoming as they are at that branch. I go out of my way to go to that branch.
I never had a problem or situation or anything that has been negative. They've done everything that was expected of them. They answered any question I've had. Anything that comes up, they explain it.
I never had a single problem. They are helpful, and do everything right so far. Most business you deal with, something is always wrong. They don't do their jobs right, or they do things wrong.
I never had problem there. The personal service there is excellent. They know me and I know them by first name. They are helpful[COMMA the personal service is excellent.
I never have any problems with them. I am very satisfied with their service.
I never have any problems. Everyone's always nice and friendly, and I just like the customer service. They're always friendly when they talk to you. Everyone's always in a good mood. It's always just really nice every time you go in there.
I opened an account, probably three years ago, and any time I had a question or concern about anything, they've always gone above and beyond to help me. I recently had an issue, and they worked with me. They helped me set up another account for myself, and were able to get my payroll and child support rerouted into my new account. Excellent customer service. They always know me by name, always listen to everything I have to say, and we sit down discuss the options we have.
I really was happy with the service, and I like it so far. They were really willing to help me, and friendly.
I recently lost my mother and just setting up an estate account. Compared to other banks in the area, I had problems with the other banks, but MY BANK was so kind. They just answered all my questions and respected me in a horrible time.
I say that because they give the best customer service. They know me by name. I can trust them with anything in regards to the account, and with anything I need when I go to the bank. They are great with people. Just the customer service. They always have smiles on their faces, and they are very respectful to the customers.
I sit down with the manager and he is superb and so are all the employees.
I started there, and they have been so helpful in showing me how things work. I called to figure out how to read online. I got a welcome card from the bank, and I just think they are very personable and friendly. They are so helpful and friendly. They work together as a team.
I think it is and we have always been treated right and we've been done right. There is no mistakes, everything is filled out correct. Been here for a long time. We've been here so long, we think it's the best.
I think it makes you feel like they're a down-home bank. Any branch you go into, it makes you feel the same. They make you feel welcome.
I think it's an excellent bank. I mean, I retired from the bank. I used to work in the bank in California for about 25 years. They are a very sincere bank. They work with the customers to give them all of what they need. I just think that they are a good bank. I've even traveled to the one in Michigan, and I even get the same treatment I do in Indiana.
I think it's because I have been with them for a long time. They are all very courteous and they do excellent work. If I have a problem with my checking account, they help me to figure out the problem.
I think, just generally, everybody was very kind and took care of my issue. Very professional. I signed up for the application for mobile banking, and the teller took me through the whole process and was very helpful. I don't know, just everything. I'm very pleased with them.
I typically go to the Wayne Dale branch and they know me by name. Once they know you,  they know you. The branch manager, Brad, calls me by name. Linda is very tentative. Kari and Amy (she's the newest one there and calls me by name) are outstanding.
I used to bank with other banking places, but they didn't connect with people on a personal level, just mainly business. First Source is genuine, nice, and they do 100 percent of what you want. I lost my bank card a couple times, and they didn't hassle me about it. They've been prompt, answered any questions that I have or ask them to do.
I was greeted with a smile and directed to the area I needed to go. It made me feel important and they met my needs. They are at Martins and I shop there. I see people leaving the bank and they always seem happy.
I was with another bank, and one of the fees would go negative, and you would have to pay fees. It was hurting me.
I was with Bank of America and they were horrible. The atmosphere is friendly, I love it. The tellers are nice. They know me and greet me.
I was with other banks. They're much better. Much friendlier. My girlfriend has been with them for about five years, and she told me to switch. They always call me by my first name. They know who I am. It's the friendly bank. Customer service is good; they're pretty quick. I live like ten minutes away, so it's good all around.
I was with PNC, and they refused to give me a loan. MY BANK had no problem doing it. I’ve had no problems ever since. Exceptional customer service. I like the new style they're bringing. It's more personal; it's not like a brick wall in front of you. Overall, the atmosphere is excellent.
I wasn't dissatisfied with anything. Great service.
I went to cash a check, and also, I went to close my savings account. They did not know me.
I went to open an account while I was on my lunch break. They helped me fast and efficiently. Been to other banks and it's just tedious to deal with them. The MY BANK employees know me.
I wouldn't go anywhere else. Anytime I have a problem, they help me out and treat me like family.
I wouldn't say they're the best[COMMA but almost there.
If I have a problem, they fix it. I just like the people that work there. It's the best bank I've ever been to.
If the manager sees a line they grab a window. I travel with my work and they're every where I'm at. I do really like the people. I like Stephanie and Andrea, the boss.
If, and when, we have any issues, they go above and beyond what we expect to help us. I like everything. They are nice and easy. I don't have to go through a lot to get to a branch, and I have them do what I need.
I'm a college student and this is the first bank I've had, so it's by my college. It's easy to get to ATMs. With my student account I'm allowed to use other ATMs with no charge. I've never had any problems. My online stuff is pretty easy.
I'm a waitress and I'm in there daily. They are always friendly, helpful, and know your name.
I'm closest to the Columbia City branch and the New Haven is where I started. They are pretty good with working with me. They're easy to work with and very personable. They are excellent to work with. They take the time to sit down with you whether you're taking a loan or whatever you need.
I'm just satisfied. They take care of every issue.
I'm just very satisfied with everything. I've been banking with you guys for a long time and am very satasfied. Very nice people I would say.
I'm not familiar with any other banks. I'm comfortable with them. I've been with them for over 50 years.
I'm not just a bank account to them. They go above and beyond to help me out. Linda and Brad have gone above and beyond. I'm a person to them, not just an account number. I wouldn't bank anywhere else.
I'm satisfied with what they do for me.
I'm very satisfied with it. I've never had any problem. They are accurate and very friendly. It's what I'm looking for, not that I'm just going to look at some crumby face!
In each and every interaction, they've been courteous. I got what I needed taken care of. First of all, they greet you, and they ask how they can help you. Some places don't even acknowledge you. Even over the phone, they are courteous. That's my personal preference. I like the service. They said they would provide it, and I like that I get that service, so that makes them the best.
It is a good bank. They have nice people.
It is friendly, helpful, and very convenient. The business hours are my favorite. I work from 9:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m., and I still have the option to go to my bank if I needed to. Those hours are very helpful. Also with my card, I'm able to pay my bills, use my overdraft, and then make a deposit.
It met my needs. They have a five star rating. The features of the branch, were fantastic. Very comfortable. No other banks have that. There was seating, TV, coffee to drink. Just very nice.
It was the best quality of service that I've received. She was very friendly and personable. For me, it's the location.
It's a small branch. Other banks just push you through, but this branch doesn't. I plan on staying with it. A good place, and I'm very happy with it.
It's a very attractive bank, and all the personnel are very effective. They all know their jobs. They are very good, and everyone is very nice and personable to you. They always greet me by name, and it is a pleasure to go there. I like the people that are there right now, and I've always liked the people that were there. They are right on the same level. They don't mess around and talk too much, I don't think. They are just serviceable. They are good. They explain things to you when you don't quite understand, and they do it very well.
It's always been a very good experience. Everyone is friendly. They do what I need to have done. I don't have any problems, ever.
It's an attractive place, and they're attractive people. Everybody is friendly and helpful. It's a pleasure to go in there. I like it very much. I go in there and before I get to the teller they use my name. When I get up front, they use my name again. They ask what they can do for me. They're always accurate and good workers. Their appearance is good, too. They're professional, and the place is like that, too. They're so friendly and pleasant. Overall It's really good, and they're informative.
It's been around for a long time. It's stable, and I feel comfortable. That's why we chose the finance person from MY BANK. They are easy to get to. The big reason I like the MY BANK in Martin's is that they are open until 7:00, and they are also open on Saturday and Sunday.
It's better than the other bank I had. They are more friendly. They are very personal. I get one-on-one attention.
It's convenient for me. I have never had any problems with it.
It's convenient personable clean very good customer service. They always talk to you and have a very good attitude about them. They are very good they know what they are talking about and are very friendly.
It's convenient, open odd hours, and people very sincere and personable. I'm just very happy with them. They help me.
It's convenient. It's easy to get in there. I really enjoy going to the Martin's branch. I have money put in there every month from my work for savings, and I think it's very convenient. I can't think of anything else right now.
It's excellent. I am very satisfied.
It's five minutes from my home. They have treated me well. I have always been satisfied with them. I have no complaints.
It's just a bank that I have never had any issues with. The employees are friendly.
It's just easy to work with them. They try to explain things, to help me understand why things happen that way. I recently applied for a loan, and they explained why I didn't get the loan, what was wrong, and how I can correct it in the future. Just that, they've been friendly, and an overall pleasant experience so far.
It's mainly because of the branch that we use. We know everyone there and they know us. I don't think I'd go anywhere else. I have made some purchases overseas via the internet and they called me concerned that there were some fraudulent charges to my card. That's probably the best thing.
It's more of a personal bank than corporate. Just their attention to your personal needs. They know your name and remember you. I've been in for a couple things. They ask you questions. They helped me with my financial needs. I've been through three different banks. I've been with MY BANK for a couple years and don't plan on leaving.
It's never that busy, and someone is always there to greet you. It is always clean. There is prompt and courteous service.
It's so personable.
It's the only bank I know. In fact, a friend turned me on to it.
It's the quality of service at both branches that I visit. The services they offer; the range of services.
It's the quality of the care when I go in there. They're very friendly and the gal that runs the place we know her, Terry. They've always taken really good care of us whenever we needed anything.
It's the quality of the people you have. The ease of doing business is very easy to do.
It's the service that I receive. I walk in and seldom have to wait in line. They are quick, happy, jovial. I enjoy the tellers who are polite and very joyful, and are not stick in the mud. They are very helpful, polite and down to earth.
It's timely and efficient. They're nice. They greet you nicely in the morning.
It's two blocks from my house. The people are very friendly, and I feel very comfortable there. Because I have never dealt with another bank. If you're happy with your bank, you don't want to go anywhere else.
It's where I do my banking. I love that bank. Everyone in there's polite, kind, and helpful. They know me by name. I feel safe there. I love the bank, and also their banking services.
I've always been satisfied with the service, the products, and the atmosphere. The service is quick and accurate. My needs are fairly simple. I am able to get it taken care of quickly and correctly, and I'm able to move on to the rest of my day. They are fair, honest, and I just don't have any problems.
I've always got good service with them. I've never had any problems with them. The tellers are very nice and professional. I just like the way MY BANK is set up. Location, too. Where I live at to where the bank is at. It's from State Boulevard to Anthony. I have to use a scooter to get around. From where I live on State to Anthony is a hop, skip, and a jump for me.
I've always had good service from them. I’ve been very impressed. There have been a few times when I made a large purchase, and they would call me to verify before they would pay it. I was very impressed for a bank to do that. I like them, all the people, and the service I get. I know you have to ask, but I can't say anything bad about them.
I've banked there since I was 18. They have taken care of me at every turn and every transition of my life so I wouldn't go anyplace else.
I've banked there since they've opened their doors. I've been at other banks, and they are, by far, the best. The best customer service, the friendliness, and the easy access to things I need; all of it. They make you feel like you're family.
I've banked with them since I was little. I wouldn't if they weren't excellent. The customer service is good.
I've banking with them for years and I like them. I like their services.
I've been a customer for a long time. I've always been satisfied.
I've been a member of 4 or 5 banks and I have been the most satisfied with First Source Bank. I like the customer service and promptness. I have been approved for loans there that I haven't been at other places. I'm very happy. Convenience it's right near my house. I have no problems with fees. They have just been very helpful.
I've been a member of their bank probably about 40 or 50 years now. They have been very nice and I've been very happy. They are congenial, very good, answered all my questions, and they did everything they could to help me. You can't ask for anything better than that.
I've been banking there since 1994, and I've always been treated well. They also went out of their way to take care of me. They didn't have to do that, but they did anyway.
I've been banking there. I get good service from them.
I've been banking with them for years, and I don't care to go anywhere else. They respect you, and there never is a line, and it's very good service.
I've been banking with them forever, and no matter what branch I go to, everyone is very friendly. They call me by name, and it's just a nice bank. They always greet you by calling you by name, they smile, they say please, and if I screwed up my thing, they're very helpful about getting everything corrected. I've never had a bad episode in the last 25 years I've been with them.
I've been dealing with them for years, and they've always treated me nicely. They always do what needs to be done. When someone was taking money from my account, they helped me with that. I just think they are nice people. They work hard. They are pleasant, and they do the work right away. They don't goof around. Also, the friendliness.
I've been doing business with them for over 60 years. I've been satisfied with them.
I've been doing business with them for ten plus years, and they are always really kind and accurate, and everything goes well there. We have several accounts there, me and my sons.
I've been doing business with this bank and its predecessors for years.
I've been going there for probably 12 years. They know me by name, and I couldn't ask for anything better, I guess. I would say that they are the best at what they do.
I've been lucky going to MY BANK, they help me out when I need assistance. I had other banks in the past and I didn't agree. I'm pleased with MY BANK, they don't have charges when you use your debit card. Other banks do.
I've been there for a long time. I know the people. They know me. That makes all the difference in the world, and they treat you right always. I was always satisfied with my bank. Any time I needed anything, they were right there for me. That's what I'm looking for. Just, they're very personable. They know you. They recognize you. They call you by name. They want your business, and it's a very friendly bank.
I've been there for over 30 years, and they are fine. I wouldn't dream of leaving it.
I've been to a lot of banks, and none of them have been as nice as them. They remember your name. I like their hours. I like that they have more than one checking account, and one is free. You have more than one option. You have a second chance if you've messed up with a different banking account.
I've been to other banks before, and they didn't seem to care. MY BANK is really a friendly bank.
I've been to other banks, and I always come back to MY BANK. It's a good bank. They've always had answers to all of my questions. They helped me work the ATM.
I've been to several branches throughout the Elkhart and South Bend area and they've all been excellent. They offer good products and services, but it's mainly the people. I've used them for business as well as personal. I've opened new personal accounts with them within the last 60 days. First of all, they're just very courteous and knowledgeable. They seem to be able to direct me to whoever can get me the information I'm looking for almost immediately.
I've been to three different branches, and everyone has been very helpful and has given me advice on my situation. Internet banking was better than what I had, so I opened up an online banking account. They helped me set up my account. Pine Valley helped me after changes. She turned her computer around and showed me how to do it step by step. Their greeting, their prompt service. Whenever you walk through the door, they are very prompt and very proficient. I've never walked in when there was a line.
I've been treated very friendly, have never had any problem there, and get called by my name. We have no reason to go anywhere else, because they treat us so kindly.
I've been with MY BANK for more than 16 years. The Columbia branch makes me feel important, and they call me by name. And when I have a problem, they take care of it immediately and then to my satisfaction. Everyone is very professional. The place is brand new, elegant, and fresh. The staff is very accommodating to me, and they always take care of me when I need anything. The headquarters, a few times, I have gone in there, and they have helped me as well. They all are awesome, and they all know me by name. And it is a good feeling. It is like home to me.
I've been with MY BANK for years, and they've always been excellent for me. Great service. It's like talking to the next door neighbor.
I've been with different banks and they actually care about any situation that happened and they are very quick to find solutions to problems. They make me feel like I'm one of them. They care about stuff. They know what they're doing. They gave me a good experience when I walk in and when I leave. I feel comfortable with leaving my finances with them, I know nothing will happen.
I've been with the bank for about 15 years, and I'm comfortable with them. They know me by name.
I've been with them a while. I don't do much. They've been good to me.
I've been with them for a long and everything has been fine. I've never had any problems. I like the way their online banking is set up.
I've been with them for a long time and more than helpful. When I inquire about anything,  they help me and do not leave me in the dark about questions that I have.
I've been with them for quite a while, and I'm happy with them. That's all.
I've been with them for years, and I guess that tells it all.
I've been with them for years, and I like everything about them. It's convenient and clean; I rarely have to wait. Whenever I've had a problem with my account, they have been helpful. I know the difference between them and other banks, and they're the best.
I've been with them for years, they've changed from OTHER BANK to MY BANK. Very friendly, professional, and solves any problems that I might have, which I never have. They greet you by name. They know what they're doing. Friendly, courteous, and done in a timely manner.
I've been with them since I was 18. My family has been with them.
I've been with them since the 1970's.
I've dealt with MY BANK for 12 to 16 years. It's always very friendly. The manager, Eric, knew my name even though I hadn't been there for six months. He knew who I was and called me by name. I was very impressed with that. I've just been so satisfied with them over the years. Everything has always been top notch.
I've gotten nothing but great service. And every time I had an issue, it was serviced. All of my family members have accounts at MY BANK, besides one brother who lives in Connecticut. It's the best deal going. It's the only bank I've ever been at that I can easily reconcile my checking account.
I've had a lot of personal dealings with them. They were always there to take care of that. Very personable.
I've had absolutely no problems with them, and they're very friendly. Professional, and very helpful.
I've had experiences with Cavanaugh. I've had a good business relationship with him, and he recommended this place. And because of that I've been very happy. I mostly came over because I was looking to refinance our mortgage. He did all the work, and he was very forthcoming with us. He paid attention to detail and got us the lowest rate we could possibly find.
I've had good service and they're friendly. There is never a long wait. I've just been very pleased. They take time to answer any question I have I never feel like I'm rushed off.
I've had great experiences with them. When I go out of town, they don't charge charges. I like everybody that works there. They know me, and I know them.
I've had no problems. They are excellent. Best bank I've ever had. It's a really excellent bank. It's a really good bank. Because they are friendly, and they are pleasant. They are easy to talk to. Really nice people.
I've had other banks in my time, but these guys take care of me. They treat you like family.
I've had other banks in the last 10 to 15 years, and I'm more satisfied where I'm at, with the service I get. I don’t have to wait for a half-hour or so.
I've had other banks where I've had my money, and the people didn't seem to be interested. The girls at MY BANK are awesome. Sometimes we have trouble with my husband's deposits, and they let me know if I need to come put some money in the bank. The only thing they haven't done is extended credit line. I like the hours and the location. The fact that I can bank seven days a week is fantastic. It is close by, and Saturday afternoon it is open.
I've had other banks, and MY BANK is nice. They go out of their way to help you. I am a small business owner, and they take care of me really well.
I've just had bad experiences with other banks, like TMC and Chase. I guess it's the closest to getting to a environment where they know my name. They actually pay attention.
I've never been disappointed. They always make me feel great when I walk in there. Everybody is just helpful and kind. It's clean and comfortable.
I've never experienced any hidden fees. Every time I go in there, they tell me what it is, and how it's going to be. It's never been any different than what they said it was going to be. They're friendly and cordial. They're Johnny-on-the-spot. When I go in, if there is only one teller, another teller will magically appear.
I've never had a bad experience. Everything was clean and professional. Everyone was very friendly. The manger wasn't there, because he was on vacation. The teller, Kinsey; I think that was her name, was really nice.
I've never had a bad experience. They're friendly, and courteous, and thorough. I've had to ask for a lot of print-outs lately, and it's got to be a pain, but they do it without complaint. The courtesy from the staff, and their willingness to help get you what you need. They're trained well.
I've never had a problem there. They are always friendly. They personally know me. They have the customer center there that comes in helpful. They always help me. The copy machine and fax machine come in handy quite a bit. They are nice there and professional.
I've never had a problem with them. They have a lot of young people in there, and they are well mannered. I never had anyone that doesn't know what they are doing.
I've never had a problem. Everyone's always prompt. No issues. No complaints.
I've never had a problem. They are extremely helpful, and whenever I have a question they are always prompt with answers. They are very friendly, and they all know my name when I walk in. I like that. They are always smiling, and they call me by my name and ask how I am doing. They are local, and I feel like they are easy to communicate with. I don't feel like I am ever bothering them, or like they don't have time for me.
I've never had an issue. They treat me well. Good customer service. Personable.
I've never had any bad experiences with them, it's the first bank I've been with.
I've never had any difficulties with them, and if I did have a problem, they resolved it immediately.
I've never had any issues whatsoever. Any questions, or anything I've wanted to do, they've helped me. Like I said, I've never had any problems at all.
I've never had any issues with the help I get from them or with my account. I've never had any problems.
I've never had any issues. There are no fees. Everything is great. There are no issues with customer service representatives when you go in.
I've never had any problems with them. I've always gotten good service from them and have never had any complaints. They're usually very welcoming, they know me by name, and they ask me how things are going.
I've never had any problems with them. You know what I'm saying? Any concern or issue I have, they seem to resolve it pretty quickly. I have a debit card. I had some fees on there that weren't mine. I took it in, and they cleared it up right away; no questions.
I've never had any problems, and they treat me well. When I went in for a small loan, they gave it to me.
I've not had any problems with it, and I accept what it is supposed to do. I've always had good luck there. I don't know. Other than that, the people are friendly, and I haven't had any problems at all.
I've tried others and MY BANK is always very helpful, kind, and friendly. Best service.
Just because of the customer service. At a lot of banks, the tellers don't think that's their main goal, but when they have a job, they have to do that job to the best of their ability. You can tell that they teach their employees to put their customers first. I've been able to tell by the times I've gone into the bank. The teller was very nice. I liked Clarissa, the person who opened the account. It's important to put her name down. So far, everything is good, and I have no complaints.
Just because they always know my name. I don't have to give a bunch of numbers, they already know everything when I walk in. I don't have to give them much information. Convenience and friendliness.
Just because we do a lot of business with them. They are very helpful, and they know us. They know how we operate. Speaking from the personal and business side, they make us feel welcome.
Just because when I go in there, the environment and the overall professionalism of everyone that works there are extremely high. They're courteous and respectful every time.
Just great service. I know the manager. Never had a problem.
Just had a good experience. My only issue is that we need one in Sturgis; it's too far to drive.
Just service mainly. I like the way the tellers are, the security of the account, and the account limits.
Just the way the people handle themselves, and how they know their stuff. They know how to do their customer service. I know I can go in at any time, and I know that I would get the good customer service that should be given.
Kind. They remember their clients by name. It seems they just do a very great job.
Knowledgeable, friendly, dependable. Accuracy.
Last August, I wanted to buy another vehicle. The Teacher's Credit Union refused the loan because it had too many miles. I dealt with Amy when I called about a car loan, and they worked with me. I got the loan, plus another loan. She has been great, and the group is stellar.
Like I said, I have never had an issue. I use the Martins branch exclusively, and they are always doing a great job. If I have ever had a problem, or concerns, they are more than helpful. They bend over backwards to help me. They have always been good to me.
Moms bank with them for years. Nice. Good place to do business with. Like bank people. Not had any problems.
My debit card got hacked and they called me right away and took care of it. They are friendly and always do their job.
My father recently died. I am handling all of his affairs. At Bluffton, and this branch, they have bent over backwards; especially Julie and Patty Randall. They answered every question I asked, and helped me with my dad's finances before and after he died.
My old bank is always a wait. No wait with MY BANK. They aware me of anything going on. It's a friendly atmosphere and good location.
My service was taken care of.
My son actually has the account. He is in the service, and every now and then, he needs me to make sure he has enough money to come home. They have made sure that he has enough money when he has to buy tickets to come home. They make sure he is covered.
Never had a problem - it's really nice.
Never had a problem. Whenever I have asked for help, they have been helpful. I like their attitude and demeanor - very friendly and cooperative. To be honest, I needed a loan for a problem I had, and they were very helpful with that, and that's why I'm sticking with them.
Never had any problems. Every time I walk in, they come around the corner and they greet me and say, Hi, what do you need? They are happy to be doing what they're doing, and it feels good.
Never had any problems. Excellent customer service. Every time I go there, the ladies know me by name when I pull up. They greet me nicely. I've had problems with every bank, but I've never had problems with your bank.
Never had trouble with them. They've always been very courteous. Years ago I was at the drive-thru and suggested you go with an interest bearing checking account.
Never received bad service ever. Helpful, nice, and friendly. They go out of their way to help you. Level of customer service is excellent. It keeps me coming back.
No issues or problems. Smooth. They take care of me.
No problems. I am a small business owner and they have taken care of my finances for 11 years. I had problems with the customer service at other banks, but no problems here.
Oddly, it is the business that we deal with that every time we walk out of there, we had a great experience. They know us by name, they know personal things that happen to us, and they sincerely care about who we are. Every time I run to the bank, I always ask my husband if he wants to go because it is such a joyful experience. Because their customer service is second to none.
Okay, well I don't know if you can get all this down. I switched to MY BANK, I think two years ago, because I was taking care of my elderly cousin. She went into a nursing home, and I had to oversee her shares. She had CDs, and I had to cash them in to pay the nursing home. MY BANK was the only bank that did not charge for early withdrawal for medical fees. The other two banks charged, and she ended up having to sell her house. I had a bad taste in my mouth for banks. MY BANK changed all of that. It was just horrendous. I switched to MY BANK, and I will never look back. It must radiant from the top-down. The manager, Bonnie Hobbs, is so friendly and compassionate. It must go from the CEO, all the way down. Because once I switched, everything has still been the same, after all that time has passed.
Once they know you personally, they treat you like a friend and like family. They don't butt in your business, but they help you. Just the atmosphere, you feel welcome. You never have an issue with them there and they make sure they do what they can to help you. You can't just walk into any bank and ask questions about personal finances and get an answer, you always get an answer at this bank.
Open late hours, friendly people, always willing to work with me, and convenient locations.
Outstanding customer service they know me by name. I use them for business and personal. They were awesome to do business with through the church so I opened up my account. They present themselves well. No question is stupid.
Overall getting stuff done. Set up computer. Beyond helpful. Good service. On my way home, been around for a long time. Help me about money. They helpful. They satisfy you.
Overall, the customer service. The very personal atmosphere you feel when you walk in. I like the layout. It doesn't seem like it's a bank when you first walk in. I like the fact that I've only been there twice, and they already know my name.
People there are very friendly, very professional, and they smile. Columbia City know their customers, they ask about my family, and they do things that they aren't supposed to do. For me, a lot of it at Columbia City. I know that the level of things that I expect is going to set a taboo. A lot of Columbia City has to do with their leadership.
People. They're friendly. They know me by name and are helpful. Location. The service that I'm given. When I need something, all I need to do is ask and don't have any problems getting what I need.
Personal service, the people that are working there and if I need something I can go in there and they take care of it.
Quality of service, friendliness, knowledge of the bank. They are a part of the community.
Quality of service, speed of transactions, very helpful. It's a bank we have had no problems with, up until now.
Quality transactions, easy access, and quick interaction time. Very helpful, like all information is given clearly. There was nothing negative in the experience at all. Just easy to use. No problems.
Really friendly. Always friendly. Done me really good.
Service provided by Adam Henson. He takes care of the details. Customer service-oriented.
Service, availability, cooperation. As I said, service, and the convenience. It's as convenient as you can make it. You can say very good.
Service. Quality. They're nice, and they're nice people to deal with.
She kept it very personal, and when my husband went in the following week she remembered him by name. We just opened our account two weeks ago. Overall we're very impressed.
Smart, knowledgeable staff.
That is the first bank that I have opened an account with, and I don't have any problems with them. They have quick service, and friendliness. They know me by name and get everything done quickly.
That's the best bank I worked with for loans and everything. Because it great people to work with. If I want to borrow money they do without hesitation and always had the best satisfaction with them.
That's the way I feel about it. They just have good service.
That's where I get the best attention. Also, because I'm not sure if they treat people the same, but they treat me really good. They are like my friends for the last four or five years.
That's where I have been for years, and I have never had any problems. I am friends with all of them. They are very friendly people. They are good people. Who else would give you alerts if something is wrong with your account? I don't think other banks would do that.
The atmosphere is very friendly. Convenient location. They offered insurance.
The bank manager after I opened my account all the time had gone by, and she called me up and asked how things were going and how our relationship was. She asked if there was anything else she could do for me. That's good. I thought that when I opened my account I had some issues with my history, but I felt they were in a compromise situation and set my account open. They were very helpful making me feel comfortable and valued as a customer.
The bank we came from did things that were different, and that really bothered me. I'm impressed with the way MY BANK does their paperwork.
The best, and friendliest service. I get the best service with MY BANK.
The courtesy, the accuracy with the account, and the friendliness. I'm all around very pleased.
The customer assistance. The professionalism. The willingness to help, and they go out of their way to help.
The customer service appreciation. They are caring.
The customer service is always great, they are always very friendly, and it's been a very helpful bank. Just my overall satisfaction with the place and extremely friendly staff, and over the phone, they are always very helpful.
The customer service is friendly, knowledgeable, and personal. They treat you like you are not just there for money. They are extremely friendly. He said he loves his job. They are wonderful. They are the best people ever to work with.
The customer service.
The customer service. If you ask for anything, they do a very great job.
The customer service. They answer any questions I need. That's everything.
The customer service. They are amazing.
The customer service; they're friendly.
The experience and everything being very good. No complaints. We feel like after shopping around, we get better deals there.
The experiences we have had. We did a mortgage roll over with them, North Anthony location, and Pine Valley location. Bigger transition we have made. Couldn't be nicer with MY BANK. We’re pleased. We have no thoughts of going somewhere else. Manager at North Anthony we were not aware. She took the initiative to be familiar. They go overboard comparing it to other experiences we've had years ago. We're completely satisfied.
The first day I went in to open my account they were very thrilled, and made me feel comfortable. I like the bank.
The friendliness and efficiency. They go out of their way to assist me.
The friendliness of the service. They have a friendly atmosphere.
The friendly and personal service. Bonnie Hobbs, and Adam Swenson, and Rachel have given me good, personal service.
The friendly people. The service is friendly, and knowledgeable.
The girls are fantastic. They get down to business, they help you, and are really super great. I would highly recommend that bank.
The girls are just wonderful. I'm getting older, and they help me with my checking when I forget once in a while. I trust them.
The help that you have at the Stevensville bank is excellent. Erica, Kim, Emily, and Saila are all excellent. I sent in a compliment card for a raise, but don't transfer them anywhere else.
The helpfulness and friendliness. Very good personality.
The last bank treated us like crap.
The location and people that work there. I've had nothing but excellent service. They're just very outgoing and very nice.
The one I went to before was the worst. It's just been so nice. They greet you when you come in. They are just really nice people. I go through the drive-thru, and they greet me by name. It surprises me, because I haven't been with them for a very long time.
The overall way I am treated is excellent. I have always had good service. I've hardly ever had to wait; I'm usually waited on right away. I love the way that they updated the bank, because I can be right by the computer.
The people and the friendliness. Courteous. They are very nice and very funny sometimes. It is a terrific bank. I just like the people there.
The people are friendly in there. They know your name. I never have to wait a long time. They are always willing to talk to you. When I put my money on my card it comes right on there.
The people are friendly, and they always take care of any problems I have. It feels like walking into a home.
The people are just very friendly. They know me by name, they greet me, the people are just great that work there. They are very accommodating to their customers, their customers come first.
The people know me and always courteous. They are always friendly, they tell me everything over the phone. They're just excellent. Brad does an excellent job. Linda is great. Carrie is my favorite teller there. I have been with MY BANK for a long time and I like it.
The people that are there are friendly, and they know me. They even know my voice over the phone. Anything I have needed from the bank, they have done in a timely manner. They are just a great group of people. I have done my banking there for years, and I have not had any problems. That is why I choose to stay there.
The people that work there at the two branches downtown and Lafayette, they are extremely friendly and on top of what's going on. I would request put a bank on West Lafayette because you have a drive-up downtown, a main source and one on the West side. We don't have a branch on the West side.
The people there are really nice to me, and they help me out with everything I need done. With anything, they help me out a lot. The way they help me out. I had a retirement plan, and they helped me out with that too. I've never had any banks treat me the way they do there.
The people there, they've always helped me and if I need something.
The people, the service that is given.
The people, the way they treat you, and the services.
The people. I'm familiar with a lot of the different people in a lot of the different branches. They are friendly, helpful, and accommodating. We have other businesses. We've taken loans. The rates are always competitive. The people at the bank have been honest and accommodating. Local, they know you by name. That's worth a lot.
The people; the tellers are personal. They call me by name. They say hi to my daughter. They are good people. I like Kim and Carrie. They are nice in the drive-thru, and in the front.
The personal service you get, and no matter what MY BANK you go to they always remember who you are. When they get new tellers they also know who you are soon. Also just the quality of service.
The personnel have always treated me with kindness and respect, like a friend. I think when you are looking at service, that is the most important: how you are treated. I have received nothing but excellent service from MY BANK, and this is not the first branch that I have been with. There was LaPorte.
The professionalism, the courtesy.
The quality and kindness of the people there. They take the time to answer my questions. They meet my expectations. They are open on Saturdays and Sundays. They have great hours. That's why I go in.
The quality of service, the personalization of services and recommendations. Any time I've had a financial change, be it positive or negative, they've gone out of their way to make sure I've gotten the very best. I'm very happy. It's the quality. I think the rates are good. They offer the most options and products and yet stay personal with you. It's very friendly place to bank.
The satisfaction we have gotten when we opened new accounts. There is no hassle, and they do not try to push us into things. It is very good service.
The service is prompt. The appearance is very clean, and the people are nice.
The service is quick, and you never have to wait.
The service was really fast and the lady was so kind and efficient. It was a really good experience. They are very helpful.
The service, their accuracy, friendliness, and professionalism. I am happy with their services.
The service. Recognition, excellent service. Friendliness. I've been at the big banks and I left one and took my business to MY BANK. I have three accounts there, I wouldn't go back to Wells Fargo if they paid me.
The tellers are very friendly, helpful, and they know what they are doing.
The tellers know me by name, and they are very prompt. When I deposit money, I will get a text about the deposit, withdrawals, and the balance. They are probably the best tellers around. It's great customer service.
The tellers know me personally. They take care of all my needs. I'm very satisfied.
The treatment I get. They're very friendly. They talk to you and want to know if there is anything else they an do for you. I get the feeling that they care about me. Like when I go into a Walmart and sometimes they are nice and other times they just want to get you out of there. I think they are all pretty friendly here. It's close to my home. The service. It's quick and they are happy to help me. The people that work there are friendly. Friendliness, cleanliness, and the nice people that work there. It's just all good from the way I have been treated.
The way the tellers handle everything. I have made calls and done things over the phone that they handle very well. They do everything I ask, and I am satisfied with the answers I get.
The way they treated me. I have been with other banks before and I like MY BANK the best.
Their customer service is great. Everyone is kind and friendly. Their work is accurate. No complaints.
Their customer service is really good. They call if there's any problems with your account, and I like that.
Their customer service. Their level of professionalism and knowledge. Friendliness.
Their level of professionalism, sincerity, and business knowledge.
Their personal service, their inviting and open atmosphere of the new design, and lastly, Jen Willhouse, from private banking, is excellent. They make you feel important.
Their promptness, courtesy, and efficiency. They remember my name when I come in. I have never had any problems or mistakes with them.
Their service and friendliness. I have been with them 30 years. They get their work done and are reasonable to work with. It's the quality of their service. Whenever I have questions, they know what they are doing.
Their service is excellent. The customer service is good. They have overall good service.
Their service is second to none. They are really nice people.
Their service. Their friendliness. I've never had any problems, and if I have any problems, they take care of it right away. Very pleased to do business with them.
Their tellers, I know them, and that means a lot to me. They know me and I would never have any fear of somebody walking in there and trying to get into my account. The overall atmosphere, it's friendly, and it's not just business as usual.
There is a bank across the parking lot. I won't go there because of the way they treated me. They charged me $200 for handling fees when I had no money in my account. There is a Huntington Bank. There are lots of banks in Dowagiac. I tell everybody to go to MY BANK.
There were two times this year when my bank card was hacked, and the tellers went out of their way to make it easy for me and helped me considerably. It's my bank.
There's nothing that I've ever brought that they haven't helped me with to the fullest extent, compared to other banks. That's why I'm with them, they have great people down there.
They all know my name. They always address me by my name. It's like a personal friend.
They always answer any questions I have. They are prompt, friendly, and polite. I have no complaints. They are always spot-on with me. I would recommend them to anyone I know, and I do.
They always do everything that satisfies my banking needs.
They always friendly. Nice atmosphere, and they call you by name.
They always give good service. They always do what is expected.
They always give me good satisfaction when I go in there. They're friendly, and they call you by your first name. They're always right there to help you with whatever you need, and they take care of my business correctly. They're very friendly and helpful. They're the best I've ever been with, and I'm 71.
They always go out of their way to make sure that my money is taken care of. They helped me learn how to balance a checkbook.
They always help me. I have macular degeneration and don't see well. I appreciate they help me through if I can't see. The personable attitude from tellers to customers. They know you by first name.
They always know my name, every single person in there. They make me feel welcome, and give my kids suckers. I have never experienced the type of customer service that I received at MY BANK. Just the fact that they know me by name, and my kid's name. I'm not in there that often, but they know me. I feel like I can call at any time and ask questions. Sometimes they are silly, but they don't make me feel like they are. They are very genuine. I have moved all of my banking to MY BANK (personal, business, and kid's 529 account).
They always recognize you and thank you. The sincerity of the tellers, the appearance of the bank.
They always remember my name. They know all of my kids. They're helpful with car loans. I really like the bank manager there.
They always take care of my needs in a polite, courteous, and efficient manner.
They always take care of my needs; some of them are complex. They are always friendly.
They always treated me as if I was a person when I went in there. They call me by name. They help you right away, even if there is a line. They tell you they'll be with you in just a minute. Real nice. It's a great bank. They try to help you with it, and suggest other things you may not of thought of. I really like that.
They always welcome me, and they call me by name. They answer my questions, and they're there when I need them.
They answer all of my questions, and they're very courteous. I don't have any issues at all. I don't have any issues at all. Very happy.
They are a lot friendlier, and it's a small town. I would much rather go to the Nappanee branch.
They are a very friendly group of people to work with. They give me answers, and they help me whenever they can.
They are actually the only bank I've had. They are the friendliest bank. They are the most helpful. If they think a purchase is not made by me, they freeze it, and I call. If there is any problem, they are on it.
They are all very nice, pleasant people every time I go in. I actually work for a doctor's office, and I know these surveys are important. I've never had any problems with them. Everybody is friendly. You can tell the people there really enjoy their jobs.
They are always completely helpful to me, friendly, and genuine. Very professional.
They are always extremely courteous, helpful, and pleasant. Really efficient. They know my name. I go in and they are right on their toes, they know what I want. I think they know my information better than I do. They have it set up when I come in. Never had any problems. They go out of their way to help. When my husband died they helped me through that, so I have no problems with them whatsoever.
They are always friendly and courteous. They complete the transaction in a timely manner.
They are always friendly and kind. They know my name, and that's about it. I don't know the teller's name, but they are all nice.
They are always friendly and prompt. They make me feel good whenever I go in there. They have always been nice, and I dealt with them when I was in Indiana too. A lot has to do with personality, and how they talk to me. That means a lot to me. How I am treated; that is really important.
They are always friendly, prompt, and my questions are always answered. They call me by name. I have never had a bad experience.
They are always neat, friendly, and nice. They always help me with whatever I need.
They are always open.
They are always polite, nice, and willing to help you with anything you need.
They are always professional. They are timely. They are concerned with seeing that I don't have any problems. They are courteous and professional. Whenever I might have a question, if I have a question, they take the time to answer it. They are quite efficient. If I do have a question, they answer it so I don't have any concerns, because they are always on top of it so I don't have to be concerned with it. It's dependable and trustworthy.
They are always really personable. They talk to you really friendly, and I have had no problems. They have taken care of issues really quickly.
They are always very courteous, always prompt, and I've never really had any problems with any of them. They have been really professional. We took a loan out, and it went through really well. They were very courteous. They called me right away. They are very professional. We don't have to wait very long. They act like they enjoy their jobs, so that's a big plus. I think I pretty much said everything.
They are always very helpful and knowledgeable. If I have any question, they answer it completely. Also, they are close to our home. I just enjoy doing business there.
They are awesome and very friendly. They call me by name, and they just help with anything I need. I guess I know them too well. The girls, and I think there is a gentleman; all of them have been very, very friendly and very helpful in a lot of different situations.
They are close to my home. All three locations are within two and a half miles of my home. They help me when I have an issue or question. I have had no problems with them. Whenever I have had a question, they answer it quickly.
They are close to where I reside. I go in, and the tellers are very personable and very professional. They greet you. I saw one of the personnel. I think she was in the backroom, and she made a point to say hello to me. She stopped what she was doing to say hello, and it made me feel at home. It made me feel good.
They are excellent, and the service is excellent. The people are always helpful. They reach out to you. It's just a different feel when you walk in, as opposed to other banks. I've been to other branches, but when you walk in, you're greeted. That's something I haven't found at other banks. Also, the professionalism, courtesy, and helpfulness.
They are exceptionally good. The gal who took care of me was quick and efficient. She was friendly and kind. She didn't have to look at the computer screen; she knew exactly what to do. I had a great experience doing this. They are real close to me, so they're very convenient. It is a new bank. I had to change banks, and they made it easy for me.
They are fast, friendly, and get the job done. It usually takes two minutes  for a withdrawal. It makes me feel welcome to go in there.
They are friendly and brighten my mood. They are friendly and ask me how I am doing. They have always gone out of their way to help me out.
They are friendly and cordial. I go in there and they are nice. So far nothing shady has happened with my account.
They are friendly people to deal with. They know me on North Anthony and they usually call my name when I walk in the door. They are friendly and they do what I want. Their service is what I need.
They are friendly, courteous, and they know my name every time I come in. The outside looks good; they are all nice and polite.
They are friendly, helpful, recognize me right away and anything I need they take care.
They are friendly, professional, and knowledgeable. They do a nice job and are easy to do business with.
They are friendly, they make no mistakes, they know you by name, always speak to you, and always have a smile on their face. They are convenient. I like the accuracy. They are neat and clean. It's a much better bank than others.
They are friendly. I use them for banking, and I also use it on the internet. If I need to fax something, they fax it for me. They go above and beyond. They address me by my first name when I go in. They could use a public bathroom. I have been with this bank the longest. I would switch banks in a heartbeat, if I didn't like it. I have three other banks. I am not hit by fees. In the past, I might have gone over, but I was not hit with fees. At other banks, it's $30.00.
They are great. They treat me well. They get things done, and they answer all my questions. The staff is extremely helpful. I just love them to pieces.
They are just really good. Every branch that I have gone through has been very helpful. They have never done anything wrong.
They are just really nice when I come in. If I've had a problem or a question, they've taken care of it. Like, somebody charged on my card, and they were very helpful in finding out how to take care of it. They are just really nice.
They are just so friendly when you come inside. They act like they are your friends. They are really friendly. That means a lot. They talk to you. Because they always ask about my daughter and my wife. We share a joke here and there. Easygoing people. Also for the opportunities they have for credit loans. Their interest rates are really fair. Last week, I refinanced a home with them. What they have to offer is excellent.
They are just very friendly and I never seem to have any problems with them. They are just very welcoming, especially that branch.
They are nice people, and they have nice manners. They answer all of your questions.
They are open very late and very early. The tellers know you by name, and they treat you like family. They are very professional, and they also give free coffee.
They are prompt. If both girls are busy, one of the girls at the window will come out and help me. I have had Jesus help me. Jesus has helped me with wills, and he is always there to give me good advice. He is a real asset to that bank.
They are prompt. It's close to my office. I use it for my mom's personal account, and for my business. She is in a home for Alzheimer's. I would say 100% for all of it, personal and business. Their service is outstanding.
They are prompt. They make time for us. I've never had any troubles. The customer service has always been great, and they go out of their way to make sure we feel at home.
They are respectful and not racist. They greet me nice and are always smiling. They have great service. There are no problems.
They are so pleasant, nice, and helpful. They know what they're doing.
They are super friendly, they call me by name, and it is just a joy to go in there.
They are the absolute best, because of the things you asked me about, and the reasons I gave. They are always on the ball. They are dressed professionally, and they call me by name. They always have excellent service. They're speedy and nice. They always help me out.
They are the best bank I've had. I've been with them for so many years, that I don't need to bank anywhere else. They treat you right there.
They are the best.
They are the best. Service, personal care, friendly.
They are the only bank willing to give me an account. Just that they are the only ones willing to give me an account. That's it.
They are very attentive. They are knowledgeable and provide excellent service. They are  always available when I need them, except for holidays. They greet me, and they are always friendly. And it is not just the tellers, but others in the office. They are respectful to my needs. Their quality meet my needs, and there are no errors.
They are very efficient, friendly, and clean. There is nothing derogatory that I can think of, no matter which branch I go into. They are very helpful.
They are very efficient. I get in and out. They recognize you, speak to you, and ask about your day. I really like going there.
They are very friendly and know me by name. They remember details from the last visit which I don't expect, they are very knowledgeable, prompt, and kind.
They are very friendly and personable. I like the hours. I like that it's a small locally owned bank and not a big bank. I just like them. I've tried Chase and Frontier. They are just my favorite.
They are very friendly. I can get in and out. They know me by name, and they create a very calming environment. They are all very nice.
They are very friendly. They address my needs. I can call and ask any questions, and if someone doesn't answer, they call back about ten minutes later and are willing to answer all my questions.
They are very friendly. They always help me out. It is always clean. When I apply for a loan, they help me from beginning to end. I would tell anyone to go to MY BANK.
They are very good at greeting customers and handling their problems. They're very friendly.
They are very good at it.
They are very helpful. It seems that they go out of their way to help you. Just their overall service to the customers.
They are very helpful. They helped with my husband's death. They have been very helpful.
They are very helpful. They're very friendly.
They are very kind and courteous. They always give me excellent service. They always treat me as a friend, and call me by name.
They are very kind and knowledgeable. They treat me like an individual, especially Tera. I was there before they were MY BANK. My husband passed away, and I stayed. I just like them. They are very nice.
They are very knowledgeable. They called me by my first name. Very nice.
They are very nice and clean. I like it. They, I get really confused when it comes to numbers, and the banker understood it and explained in a courteous way. It was very well kept, nothing out of place, they welcomed you right away and it is a family environment. Homey.
They are very patient with me and my accounts and my craziness that happens when I do these transactions. Nice - the tellers are very patient to work with. Really great bank.
They are very personable, and know me by name, so I feel valued. They know the answers to my questions. They provide services I need, especially when I can't get those services from other banks.
They are very personable. They remember your name and greet you with a smile. They ask if they can help me with anything else. Convenient location: they are at the edge of town right by my home. I don't have to go into town. That is why I opened my account with MY BANK.
They are very personal, and they know me by name. They always know what I am in there for, and what to help me with. They even know me when I call. They are always happy. They always take care of any issues or concerns instantly.
They are very polite and helpful.
They are very polite, they treat you with respect, they always have a smile when greeting you. I wouldn't go to any other bank. They have a personality to them. They greet you; not grumpy, or grouchy, and as soon as you walk in, they ask how you are doing. Like I said, I wouldn't go to any other bank.
They are very prompt with service. If you have a question with your account they are right there to answer your questions.
They are very smart, friendly, and clean. They dress really properly. They got me a better car loan. They got me a better interest rate. I refinanced my loan from another bank with them. I was very satisfied with that MY BANK. They saved me money. It helped out me and my family in the long run.
They are working with me. The services better. I think I wish I would have checked them out a couple of years ago.
They been the best and most gracious. It's just a good bank, we wouldn't be with if it wasn't. I really haven't done much with others. I don't know how anybody could be any better.
They call me by my name before they look at my stuff. I've never had a problem with them. I'd never been with a bank that I didn't have issues with before. They are friendly. They are always chipper and happy!
They come out and greet you. They are personable, and they offer you a drink. They talk to you. It's a nice atmosphere, and I like that. They greet you at the door. It's great. They talk to you. They explain to you. This last time I had a problem with my checking account, she showed me the problem and fixed it right away. She fixed it instantly. It was really nice. We also took out a loan, and the process was simple. It was nice. Other places it's a hassle and stuff, and they are not as personable there. They offered drinks and called us by name. It was very nice.
They deal with you personally and they know you by name. There is coffee there. There is a place for you to get on your iPad. They will call if I don't have enough money.
They did everything I asked and were friendly and polite. We had no issues and no complaints whatsoever.
They do a good job. They answer all of my questions. They ask me about what I need. They take care of me really well. They are good people, and they treat you like a person.
They do a great job, all of the girls. They all do a great job. Mainly, because of the treatment I get when I'm in there.
They do a great job, and they know who I am right off the bat. It is perfect.
They do a very good job. They are nice and professional. They are brief, and to the point, to respect my time. It's really a combination of personal and prompt service.
They do everything I ask them to do, no matter what it is.
They explain things thoroughly. They understand you as a customer and they make the customer feel comfortable in asking a question. They don't make you feel like it's a silly question. The teller[COMMA the loan officer[COMMA they don't make you feel silly for asking a question. They're polite[COMMA very nice[COMMA and they make you feel welcome. They call you by name like they know you well enough to speak to you and they say What can I help you with? no matter who you are. It's comfortable and convenient. They made it easy for you to get what you need and it couldn't be possible for some banks.
They get to know you personally, and they are always there when you need them. They always try to help you. They are very friendly.
They give good customer service. I had to do an international transaction, and they walked me through it. They actually called me when they realized it was trying to go through. They called to make sure that I was doing the transaction. They know me and my husband by name.
They give us good service and we have not had any problems. We have banked there for a long time and have been satisfied.
They give you personal service. Everything is confidential. They are very friendly. It's convenient to my home, and they have good hours.
They go above and beyond to help me. No problems at all.
They go out of their way to do everything possible for your baking needs. They do anything in their power to get a loan if you need one, and with other banks you go through the ringer. These guys get you a loan, no hassles.
They go way beyond. They really help you when you go in there.
They greet me by my name, and they listen to you. Excellent customer service.
They have a very human quality about them. I had to cash in CDs for a relative. She had CDs in three different banks, and MY BANK was the only one that didn't charge for a medical reason to cash them in. Everyone speaks to me when I go in, not just the teller. It is just a nice place to go.
They have addressed every need we've ever had. They're extremely professional, they're very pleasant to do business with, and I just feel very comfortable that all of our accounts are with them. I feel like I have a professional banking relationship with the employees.
They have always been able to take care of my needs, and all questions have been answered. They are very clear. If I have a question about something, they always give me the best way to do the process, and give me the advice I need.
They have always been accurate, and I have never had any problems at all. We had a credit card that was misused somewhere in the country, and they notified us right away, and took care of it. We have never had any problems. They have always treated all customers with courtesy, and have given excellent service. They are prompt, and are willing to help out immediately. I work three blocks from the bank, so that is convenient for me. They have excellent service, and are friendly.
They have always been considerate, friendly, and very professional. Convenience from my home. They are very nice every time I go there.
They have always been courteous and helped me with problems with accurate time.
They have always been very caring and personable. They treat you with respect. They help you with whatever you need. My husband was stricken with some type of virus, and he just came home three weeks ago from the hospital. He had always taken care of all the finances. They have been helpful to me with the transactions. They have asked me how he is doing. They are just like family.
They have always been very fair to me. I needed a check traced and they did it, reissued me another one. Every month or every other month I go in there and they are very friendly. They smile and call me by name. It makes me feel like I am at home. A different bank I went to wouldn't change a $50 bill because I didn't have an account there. MY BANK helped me get a loan and that helped me.
They have always been very kind to me and help me with any problem I have. They are really friendly.
They have always given me good service. They cooperate in every way.
They have always handled my needs, very professional, and are very accommodating.
They have always paid attention to me, they are very helpful, I never have to wait, and they are hassle free. They are even nice to me when I don't go to the bank. They are very nice to me.
They have always treated me extremely well. They know me by name. The girls in there are extremely helpful. I've had other bank accounts in other banks, and I've never had customer service like the way they do it.
They have always treated me fair and always know. Everybody in there has always been kind and knows me by name. That means a lot. I never had any problems whatsoever.
They have always treated me with respect and know me by name which a lot of banks don't. I haven't had any bad experiences with all of the tellers who are really nice. It's convenient. I like the hours. At Stevensville it's until 7:00 p.m. and Saturdays and Sundays until 3:00 p.m. Not many banks are open seven days, which means a lot.
They have been very attentive to all my needs and issues that come up. The service was much better than my previous credit union. The ease of use of online website and ability to use financial tools.
They have been very attentive to my needs and my company's needs. They helped me to grow. I have had several banks in 30 years of business, and I have never had the kind of support that I have with them.
They have been very good with my loan, and very good with what I have done there.
They have been very kind to me, courteous, friendly, and I go in there every day. The employees are the best.
They have better hours than any other bank I have been to. I do construction, so I work late, and the bank is open until 7:00 P.M. Very friendly staff. They have always been nice every time I went there. They see my name and they call me by my first name, not just Mr. or Sir.
They have great personal attention.
They have nice people who work there. They are extremely friendly. They are willing to help answer any questions that I have, or any that other people may have.
They have taken care of my business for years. If there is a problem, they answer me, or they solve it immediately. When I lost my husband, they were supportive, and they instructed me on what I needed to do.
They have very accommodating hours and everyone is friendly and helpful. They call me by name and they always smile. In my dealings with other banks I haven't had this type of service.
They have very good customer service.
They have very nice people that can answer your questions. I've been helped in many ways.
They help me out a bunch. The girls are really nice, and they know my needs. They're very courteous, and they help me out.
They just always take care of my needs. Always friendly.
They just do a great job. I never had an issue with them. The friendly staff and their knowledge.
They just do their job. It surprises me they always know my name with all the other customers they have. I have a back and leg problem, and the last couple of times they gave me a chair to sit down.
They know me by name. I'm always in and out. I've had loans through them before. My check always goes through. Online banking is always easy. They're helpful.
They know me by name. They care about me as a person and care about my family. They treat me with great respect. Very professional, very knowledgeable, and great to deal with.
They know me when I walk in. If I have any questions, they answer them right away. They just have the friendliest tellers ever. They are just super. The branch manager, Carrie, is fabulous. If I need anything or have questions, they can help me right away. They are so friendly to work with. The office is open on Saturdays, and it's nice to go in on a Saturday morning if I need to.
They know me. I feel like they are there to help me with any issues. I inherited a great deal of money from my father who also banked there. They made the process much easier during a time I was grieving. They transferred funds. It was easier than it had been with another bank I had dealt with in a similar fashion and will never bank at that one again. When I walk in one, of the managers always walks up and greets me. I feel like I am wanted whether with a large or small amount of money.
They know me. I have been there for a couple years. They are good to me.
They know me. They are always helpful. In general, they check up on me if something weird happens with my account. In general, they have my interests in their thoughts if I'm not right in front of them, as well as when I'm in front of them. I think that about covers it.
They know who I am by name. Never had any issues, and don't have to wait in line.
They know who I am. They ask me about how I am doing, and they call me by name. They are very customer-savvy. It's a high-class bank. They treat you with respect. They are interested in their customers, and they make your day more positive.
They know you by name. They ask you what you need as soon as you walk in the door, and before you leave, they ask if you need anything else. They are very polite. Their manners are great, their intelligence is good, and they are very friendly.
They make you feel like your hometown. Make you feel good when you go in, make you feel good when you go out, and it's a good atmosphere. It's easy doing business, very simple.
They meet all of my banking needs. They're enthusiastic. They ask if they can do anything else for me. They make me feel very at home. The cookies and coffee.
They recognize you when you come through the door. They ask you what you want. I'm satisfied with them. They are a good bank. Everyone there is pleasant and they dress nicely. It is a friendly atmosphere.
They seem like they have nice services. Nice and clean, and I feel welcome.
They strive to provide good service, and they are convenient.
They take care of me, and they answer any questions I have. They follow up. They treat you like you are somebody.
They take the time to listen to their clients. They give us peace of mind with security issues. Overall, they are the top in satisfaction over all of the banks in town.
They take the time to understand our needs, and they address us by name. They're friendly, kind, courteous, and helpful. They offer the best service. We get excellent rates. They're always prompt and helpful. If I could use them for everything, I would.
They talk to you really nicely when you go in there. I don’t go into any more than that one.
They took care of me when I moved to this area. They were very helpful.
They treat me like family. If I have a concern, they are always there to take care of it. When I had my emergency surgery, they were going to give me a loan for that, but I didn't need it. I told her that I had a medical bill to pay. She said to talk to Rob for a loan, but I didn't need it. It's not fake concern, they care. They treat you just like family. You have a really good group of people working for you.
They treat me like I'm part of the family. When I was sick and had my hip replaced, I called down there because I questioned something and they verified it for me. I needed some cash and they brought it down to me. They're very courteous and treat everybody very nice.
They treat me nice. I know everybody there.
They treat you like a person. They get to know who you are. The girl there has been so kind and considerate. They're very helpful.
They treat you like family and know you on a first name basis. They know who I am. Just that they treat you like family and are very personable.
They treated me very well so far. There is nothing to complain about. The service for my whole family is perfect. They treat me like family.
They understand my needs as a customer and do their best to fulfill those needs. I feel sincerity from the team members there. I feel like it's a small town bank, not a big bank where I'm not a number. What they had to offer is not the same as the other banks. How they treat me as a customer makes the difference to me.
They were friendly and a pleasure to do business there. Customer service, they listened to us.
They were like really good. They gave me what I needed and I was really satisfied with the service they provided me. I'm looking forward to opening up another account with you. I'd like to mention the manager Bonnie. She was really good.
They’re all really nice.
They’re kind. All the problems I’ve had while I was ill. If I couldn’t make it in there or was sick, I was calling, and they were helping me with what I needed to know. They know me. They greet me by name when I walk in the door. They are nice people.
They're all nice.
They're all so friendly, and they make you feel welcome when you get there. They've always been able to help us with whatever we needed. All the girls I've had wait on me seem very nice.
They're always friendly and they are nice. I have never had any problems with anything. All questions have been answered that I've had. They are definitely the best.
They're always friendly, courteous, and make you feel very welcome.
They're always friendly. They call me by name. They're very prompt. They're just always really friendly. I like that. Everything about them is great. I wouldn't go anywhere else. They're courteous, helpful, and prompt.
They're always helpful. I don't have to worry about waiting in line and having [omitted] service.
They're always on it and friendly and helpful and personable, not just automated. I've never had any issues. If I call I always have my question answered or figured out. They talk to me in a personal way, they use my name, they ask how my kids are, and they know me. I've been going there a really long time, so it makes me feel like they know me.
They're always professional, well dressed, courteous, and greet me by name. They ask me how my family is and sincere in asking. It's just a positive experience every time I go there. Banks don't do that. Everything, like I said, their overall appearance, their customer service, and their timeliness. They don't waste my time, they get me in and out.
They're always prompt. They're always friendly. They're not grumpy. No matter what time of day it is, they always have a smile on their face, and they're very comfortable. Very personal.
They're always there, friendly, and know who I am. They're fast and I've never had a problem with things not working. And if something was wrong, they will contact me immediately.
They're awesome there. I travel a lot. If I have any problems at all, I can count on them to help me. They are friendly, and I consider them like family.
They're awesome. Not everywhere you go do they treat their customers excellent. I recommend you guys to everybody. They know their customers. As soon as you walk in they know you. You're not ignored.
They're courteous. Dependability. We have been very happy with them.
They're everything you've described. They're friendly and professional. They greet you by name. They know my kids. They are always giving my kids suckers. I haven't had a single problem with them. I haven't had any banking issues or anything like that. I've had that in the past with other banks. It's nice.
They're friendly and not judgmental. Our whole family is a part of it, so pretty much know us by our first name.
They're friendly, accommodating, and they know my name. It's like a small town business instead of Bank of America. I've had savings accounts, CDs, and loans, everything's always been good, no problems. If I need to transfer money or check a balance or go in and talk. I usually talk with Carey at the grocery store. You could use a drive-thru at the Nile, other than that, everything's good. The people and the service.
They're friendly, knowledgeable, and professional. That's all I need.
They're friendly. They answer your questions. They help you, and they're friendly. If you've got any questions they answer it. They help you in every way.
They're just always good to me. They treat me like they're my friends. They're always so willing to help and very friendly. They're smiling and always friendly. I don't know.
They're just great people. They're friendly and helpful. I deal with a lot of banks, and they are the best.
They're just great, never had a wait in line. I haven't lost anything and it was easy to set up. The way the store is set up is, I guess you could say, attractive. There is always a smile on every teller's face, and they are happy to see new people too.
They're just really nice. I like how you can go up to the teller. They are very helpful and sincere. They are very nice. I have dealt with other banks, and I like MY BANK the best. They are very personable.
They're just so friendly, helpful, and knowledgeable. I've been going there for a number of years, and they've always been really nice.
They're just wonderful people, they care about you, and they care about your banking and they're all over wonderful people and I love them! I've always had good banking with them and I've never had a problem and I've always been happy with them and I banked with them when I was with OTHER BANK and I was like oh dear I hope I get a better answer.
They're like family. They're just comfortable people. They're very sweet and very kind. They're very good at watching my account, and they will call me immediately if something doesn't look right. They call me immediately.
They're number one, open when I need them to be, and are nice.
They're personal. They're always helpful to me. It's the only bank I have. I can't really speak. I have no reason to leave the bank, based on customer service, and my experience there. They're very helpful, and they're always able to answer my questions for me.
They're real close to my home, and they're very, very polite. I had a couple problems in the past month, and they worked with me completely, 100%. They worked them out. Many reasons. The politeness of the people, and the knowledge and know-how when I have a little problem. Like I say, they're close to my house, and I'm just very, very happy with their service.
They're service is outstanding. Normally they know you by name. It's always clean and orderly, and they're friendly. The convenience of their hours is fabulous. Being open on Sunday has been a life saver more than once.
They're the most friendly I've ever seen. We always talk and joke. They keep track of everything that goes in and out and they're pretty good. The other banks I had never did that. They make me feel like they're part of my family. They're good, happy people.
They're the only bank in town that I know that they know your name when you walk in, and that's a lot of names.
They're very attentive to my needs. Very professional. I like their online banking and all the services.
They're very convenient here in town location-wise in the Martin's store, close to my house. The online capability being able to transfer money. The website has never gone down on me. If I have a question, I call the downtown branch, and there is always someone there to answer my questions.
They're very courteous and prompt. Kept in contact with me, and I didn't run into any problems with them.
They're very courteous and very well dressed. The bank always look good. I have visited other MY BANKs.
They're very friendly no matter what branch you go in. The portage central one in particular, they know me by name. As soon as I come in, they always greet me. Even though they changed staff a few times, they're always polite and nice. I have two accounts there. I just think they're the best bank in the area. Even when I moved out of state, I still used MY BANK here.
They're very friendly, and they've helped me. Julia helped me a lot, and when my husband passed away they helped me get everything in order. It's come in very handy for me. I'm a retired teller myself, so I know what the banks do. I enjoy going there. The minute you enter they say hello and ask how they can help me. They have cookies, and they say they hope I enjoyed the little treat while I was in there.
They're very friendly, make sure you get what you need, and do things right.
They're very friendly. They always call me by my first name. They seem very sincere when they're helping me.
They're very personable. They greet you by your name. I've been to all of them in Fort Wayne, and I've never had a problem. To me, they are the best bank in the state of Indiana.
They're very prompt. They've always been friendly, even if I've had trouble explaining what I need. They are good at what they do. I haven't had any problems. I think they are good so far.
They're very prompt. You know, they have open hours. They're very helpful.
They've always addressed me by name. They're always friendly.
They've always been able to help me when I've gone in and I've had to call sometimes with questions. They've always answered my questions and we have a private banker who is great. They're very convenient. I love having the bank right at the grocery store.
They've always been very helpful when we go in there. It's a better bank than what we used to be at. Everyone's friendly. They go out of their way to help you.
They've always exceeded my needs. It's convenient to my home.
They've always met my needs and then some. They have excellent customer service, and I've always been pleased with them. I have my home mortgage with them, my daughter's first account, and I had no problems setting up those things. I don't have anymore to add.
They've always treated me like family, and they know me by name. The fellas in there, and the guy who is the manager; everyone treats me great. Just the service, overall.
They've been excellent in everything I've asked, and they've been on time. And they are very timely. When they say they are going to do something, it gets done. I'm in what they call their private banking or personal banking, and they've assigned me a person at the bank to help me when I need it. I like the fact that they get things done without delay. They address issues, finish jobs, and get things done in a very professional and businesslike manner. They are very good at following the golden rule: treat others the way you would like to  be treated. They are very personal and accommodating.
They've been really good to me since I've started with them. I needed an available, public service, but I wasn't a member of the bank. So, I went back to them and started doing business. Overall, they have good service and a hometown feel.
They've been the most friendly organization that I've been involved with. The personnel are very friendly and knowledgeable about what they need to know.
They've been very attentive to me. I feel like I'm the only customer in the branch when I go in there. They haven't made any mistakes. That helps.
They've been very helpful. It's convenient.
They've been very, very helpful and friendly, and like I said, they work with you. Right now, I have my car payment with them and my checking. They worked with me to transfer money, so I don't have to go in all the time. They are all friendly and always nice. When you go in, they know who you are. They are usually all ready for me by the time I get to them.
They've helped me out a lot, answered all my questions. The woman that runs the place has helped me out a lot. I know no one is perfect, but this is the best bank.
Thinking of the past banks, I haven't had as many problems with MY BANK. I'm satisfied with their business. I like the different services they provide, and the fact that there are no extra costs.
Those people up there are so nice, help you in any way they can. I've so many loans with them. They help me at home with paperwork. I wouldn't go anywhere else.
Treat me well. They are kind. No issues at all. Nothing bad to say.
Typically they call me by name, and my husband and my dog too. They recognize me. They are friendly. To sum it up, they are quick to answer my questions and to wait on me. I have had no issues with the bank.
Used them for years. Always treated me well. Anytime I needed help, they helped me. Convenient and friendly. Just like going there.
Very convenient. I work on campus. Banks close early.
Very excellent service. It is very clean, and they have down-to-earth people. When you walk in the door, they greet you, and they take care of your business. The convenience of the location. It is right down the street from my home. I am disabled, so that makes it nice.
Very friendly service. Excellent expressions.
Very friendly tellers, and have always helped in a professional and quick manner. The branch manager is also very helpful and friendly. The hours of operation.
Very friendly, courteous, and prompt. If you have children, they are very pleasant. They are just all-around good people. Little things; where they have computers. They are always helpful. Mainly, it's their friendly, pleasant attitude.
Very friendly, very knowledgeable. Great customer service. I have been there for 15 years, and I've never had a problem.
Very friendly. Excellent service. You don't have to wait in line. If I have a problem, they help me with it. I have banked with them since 1985. They have good products. My son open his first account there, and they were very friendly and personable to him.
Very friendly. They know my name, and they know my account number. Very efficient.
Very glad they chose to open their new bank and the personnel that they brought in. They are very neat clean and respectful. I'm likely to stay there.
Very good customer service. They act like they actually care. Whenever I had a question, they answered it promptly with adequate information. I haven't had any problems with them so far. I haven't run into any obstacles.
Very good luck. Good customer service. Very friendly and very helpful.
Very good service when I go in there. The bank is handy to my job. The people have been very helpful.
Very good, I guess. They take care of you when you go in.
Very helpful. Everything they should be.
Very nice and greet me. I'm satisfied how they handle my business. Everything is excellent. Seems like they know what they are doing, seems like they are great.
Very personable, they don't forget who you are, and they are prompt and just genuine. Also, they seem to take care of your business. They inform you of promotions with CDs and stuff that is going on to make you aware, even if you weren't interested. If you walk in, they mention they have a good rate for CDs. When the rates are due, they always inform you of a better way to do something. They are just very good and excellent.
Very personal and attentive. They listen to you. They are just very professional, and they have lots of energy.
Very personal. I have not left the bank wondering what the answer to a question was. They take care of you. They make sure they answer all of your questions. Even when you sign up for different options. When they reach maturity, they were good at offering options to where to put the money.
Very prompt and friendly.
We banked with three other banks, and their service was very bad. So, we switched to MY BANK, and their service has been the best.
We done business for 50 plus years. It's convenient to where we live. I like the people. They are friendly, call you by name, and we talk about things other than banking sometimes.
We have banked there for a long period of time. They are polite and friendly. I am 100% satisfied. I do not like the way they did the new structure in the building. I have to be at a side position to the teller. I do not like the side position. I like to look at the teller face-to-face. The personality of the people, and the location. I have never had an issue.
We have banked with them for a long time. There is always friendly and helpful people. Easy access and closer to our home. We've never had a problem.
We have been dealing with Comcast Cable. We have a few issues with them. They need to go to the bank and get an education from the people there. They do an excellent job. They are close to home. I am less than a mile from the office, and they are handy. They are excellent. They do a good job. They can't do any better than that. I tell them that every time I walk out the door, and they thank me for coming. They just do a good job. They are very professional. They are just good people. The interesting thing about it is the way they have changed the lobby, and you can look at the computer and see what is going on. It is always a pleasant visit. I never walk out of there wondering if I did something wrong or if they gave me the wrong answers. They are well-trained and interested in their customers.
We have been with them for the early 1980s when it was OTHER BANK. They go out of their way to be helpful and do what we need in the way of service. We can't say enough good things about them.
We have multiple accounts and business accounts. I've just been doing work with money management and stock management, and I've recently changed insurance through MY BANK. And, I'm in the process of refinancing our house.
We love the location, the hours, and the employees. We love the checking, and if we were to open a new account, it would be with them. I like their customer service. I like how they fill out the forms for me, and all I have to do is sign them.
We picked it, because of the simplicity of the banking, and because of the branch manager and the assistant branch manager. Brittany came over and helped us when we initially walked in. Stephany came over and called me by name, so we liked that very much. Brittany was the branch manager, and Stephany was the assistant branch manager. When we looked at the other banks, they were very confusing. We like the online capabilities and the online features for how we needed our accounts set up. They were very, very helpful.
We were there at that bank when it was OTHER BANK. Even when it was OTHER BANK, we didn't have any problems. I just retired, so,being in selling, I got with customers who had different banks from all over and heard the problems they had. We haven't had those problems. I also have an account with Chase. They had a nice program at Chase, but when it came time to roll over my pension and IRA, I chose MY BANK. The banker was so wonderful. When I left my job, I had to retire earlier than I thought. They put in a different retirement date. My company was the one who messed up, and the banker was so courteous. He had to redo all the paperwork. They were all so understanding, and I tell people. I send them to MY BANK, not Chase. If something comes up, I don't go to my banker at Chase. I go to MY BANK. In my years of dealing with people and being out in the work force, it was his professionalism, and he took a personal interest. He did everything he could do, and above and beyond. My company made the mistake. It was such a mess, yet he was so wonderful with it. It was just great. All of them, the girls, too. They are always wonderful.
Well because I've dealt with them for 40 years and I've always been happy. I like all the people, and I've never had any trouble. I run several business through MY BANK and have never had any trouble.
Well just because of all the questions that I just answered excellent to for the bank. The employees are very welcoming. They are great people.
Well, because I feel like family when I walk in there. They are nice and helpful. They even fill out all my deposit slips for me. They are so helpful. They are 100%, because they are friendly and clean.
Well, because I just switched over. I was a member of a credit union, and everything they've done has been excellent. They gave me my money early in December, and now I can buy more Christmas presents. Also, the convenience of the branches. They are all close to my house, and you can even go while you're shopping in the Martins branch!
Well, because it is very nice to walk in, and they know who you are. For instance, I was using my savings account as a checking account. They let me know that I was using a lot of money, because I had an excess amount of withdrawals. To be honest, I don't think that anybody else would have brought that to my attention. It's just nice that they know you. When you walk in, they acknowledge you. If you have to wait, you feel comfortable waiting.
Well, I had to change banks, and I heard a lot about that bank, because I live right across the street. It's very close for me, and a lot of people go there, and I was told to go there. I just opened my account there, and it was so wonderful over there. The girls; I didn't see too many men, but it was excellent. They were very, very nice.
Well, I have been with them through all of the different phases. I've been stuck with them forever. They were First Federal, and now they are MY BANK. I will probably stay with them forever. They have always treated us like family. They know us when we go in, and that's nice, you know.
Well, I have never had any problem with them, always been very helpful. Very responsive when you have a question or need information. I'm just very satisfied with them.
Well, I haven't personally explored any other companies. I always rate MY BANK the best. They are very polite and professional. It's always easy to get in and out.
Well, I'm very satisfied with everything overall. They are convenient. I've dealt with them for years, and never had any problems with them.
Well, it's because of all of the reasons we have talked about so far. It was just the way we were treated when we set up our account there. We liked their expertise. The person who helped us out was very knowledgeable. We are so glad that we opened up an account there.
Well, I've always had good service. I just like the service. They're always kind and helpful. The only thing is there's no drive-thru in my area.
Well, number one, the quality of people that work there. The care they give to customers, the friendliness, and the accuracy. We just wouldn't go anywhere else. Well, I don't even think about going anywhere else.
Well, they are friendly. They know what they are talking about. I have even spoke with the manager, and she is intelligent with her work. They are all really friendly. They do not try and make you wait in line. In fact, that is something I have never had to do at MY BANK.
Well, they are the best. I like the customer service. They make me feel welcome.
Well, they greet you. They are friendly, speedy, and they know what they are doing. There are no long waits. They recognize you if you have been in there before.
Well, they're knowledgeable. They care about the customers, and I've never had a problem with MY BANK. They take care of whatever business I have. I had, in the past, used it for a business account when I ran my own business, and I've always had excellent service from MY BANK. Well, there are a lot of these big national banks that come in, and then they leave. And I don't trust them. I trust MY BANK because they're local. They understand the local people very good. It's excellent. I wouldn't go to any of the big national banks that come in and open up branches, so I do business locally.
We've been banking with them. We have business there, savings, checking, and we have been with them for years. We just think they're the best bank around.
We've had nothing but good service out of them. Good people waiting on us. They've always been very helpful. We're very satisfied. They're very personable people. They're the best that we've found anywhere.
When I go down there I know whatever I need they will do their best to help me with whatever I need help with. I know them.
When I go in there it feels really personal. They talk to you, they know my name, everything there is fast. I went to set up my account a few months ago, and they were very quick with it, very nice, they even have cookies.
When I go in there, they take care of my business. I needed to get some money out of my account, and she grabbed the withdrawal slip and filled it out for me. I get personalized service, and they are always friendly.
When I go in, I get what I need. They help me figure out what's going on with whatever I'm dealing with. I've been with MY BANK for a while, and I'm just happy.
When I go there I get quality service. I get what I need, and when I ask for something I get what I want. I like the promptness of the statements. I think when I retire I'm going to put all my stuff over there.
When I go there, if I have questions, they have the answers. If I need to talk to someone, they spend the time to talk to me. It is super excellent. Very friendly. They always have time for you. You never have to wait for anything. I really like the bank. MY BANK is like being at home for me. They stand out.
When I go to MY BANK, I’m treated at as a valuable customer, unlike another bank that my wife uses. Any questions or problems I’ve had, they go out of their way to help me. They bend over backwards for the customers.
When I got there I was shocked as to how nice the bank was, and I was extremely happy with the service. I didn't feel rushed. They took their time with me and were very helpful.
When I switched banks and I went there, they were very friendly, they knew my name, and I consider them my friends. They're always courteous, and I can do transactions from the phone.
When I was with OTHER BANK I had an issue with a particular check I got for the trust account, and they decided on their own to send the check back to the writer without my knowledge. Ever since that, we pulled out everything from there into MY BANK and have been very happy. We recommend the bank to our family.
When you walk in it's the greeting, taking time to explain really well. Perfect. Always comfortable. I don't have to wait long. Just great. I can't say anything, but they have the best of care and consideration. Perfect bank to bank at.
Where I work, that's where we make our deposits daily. Whenever I come in they're courteous, prompt, and take care of me right away. They do a good job. They take care of me. If I have a question they can answer it. When I opened my account I had some problems with the online banking, so I went in and spoke to Rachel, and she helped me out.
Why? They just have great service, hours, and times. I enjoy going in there.
With all the above on the questions you asked and the business. The personnel is friendly.
You are treated well. Everything works well. You leave with a smile on your face. They go above and beyond. They are excellent, nice people.
You get to know the tellers and it's like seeing a friend. Can't think of anything else.
You get very good service there. They're always polite, and I've never had any troubles with them.
You guys have excellent service. Always friendly, nice, and professional. I like your online service.
You have that small-town feel. I walk in the door, and they address me by my first name. They're extremely friendly. I worked in retail for over 40 years, and when you have that experience, it makes you feel good all over.
You touch on the name part. I am always surprised that even new employees know my name even when I go there once or twice. They are very accepting, even when I was a young age and went in there. I have a spouse who banks with a competing bank, Chase, and it seems that they have quotas to push other services than the one you went in there for. They push walk-up deposits or other features or online things. With the name part, I thought it was kind of nice that they knew who I was. I like to show my ID, but at the same time, it is nice that they know who I am.
A couple of weeks ago, the lady took forever. I had to ring the bell. I waited for four to five minutes. She informed me that there were only two people there. Then, she left the window to do my transaction. I got a deposit slip for the whole slip amount. She didn't even look at my slip, and then it took another five minutes to fix it. She never offered an apology.
At the Dowagiac branch, they are really rude. They don't say, Hi, when you go in. We have asked them for a loan, and we never got help with that. Yesterday, I brought $22 in, and she acted like she couldn't believe I had only $22, like she had to waste her time with $22. Every time I go in, they act like they are irritated that they a have to deal with me. When I went there yesterday, they don't want to talk to you, and they are short with you. It's not like they say, Hey how's your day? They don't make an effort to be hospitable. I walked in, and they didn't say anything, and she knew I was there and didn't say anything to me. I had to speak first. They are not friendly. I was standing there in silence. We are switching banks because of that branch.
Because I don't have a computer, and I don't have access to a computer, so I always have to call my son if I have any questions about my account. I don't think I should have to do that. He's got an iPhone, and he can tell me information about my account.
Because I don't like the manager there. She has been rude to me.
Because I needed a print-out, and I didn't feel I needed to pay $5.00 for it. She told me that I could go online, but not everybody is capable of going online.
Because of the dark dirty alley where the drive-thru is located in and the poor access to the interior portion of the branch. It's extremely dark in the alley for the drive-thru. There are many people that will not even walk down that alley. It needs more light. It's not very welcoming from within your vehicle at all. Most people would have a hard time turning down that alley like a soccer moms in a Tahoe. They would avoid it. I drive a pick-up. I drive through very slowly, and I drive for a living. It's narrow, and it has a very tight corner. There is a pillar on your right that you’re turning around and one on the other side.
Because they are not open on the weekends, and I would like them to be open on the weekends.
Before, the other manager used to make me feel welcome. Now, it's not like that. I don't feel welcome anymore.
Drive-thru hours created difficulty for the business. That is it.
I expect personal service, and I get none. I have three accounts at the bank, and the bank is totally unprepared to offer personal service. I'm not asking for anything special. I have had an account for over five years. I work upstairs. I walked into the bank with a check from my daughter for $12, and they wouldn't cash it. I have over $3,000 in my account.
I had a mistake in my checking account. They know I have two direct deposits every month. I made a mistake with my account. I had four checks that bounced and was charged fees for, even though the bank knew I was going to have that money come in two days. It ended up costing me $250.00 altogether, and I am not happy with the bank.
I had some problems with the manager and another worker there. They said that MY BANK would not cash my checks, but I went to another MY BANK branch and they did cash the checks.
I opened a title loan against a bike that was worth $3,500 cash. I brought it down. I'm short $650 in funds. I'm trying to fix this up. I pulled the title loan out for $1,500. That's all they would give me. I went down to Spring Leads and pulled a personal loan for $3,000. I've been paying promptly on time, paying all my bills. He didn't tell me the payments would be automatic either. He said they would send a bill. And they came out automatically, so my wife had to pay for it.
I went in with a situation that was not my fault or the banks fault. Amazon took out money that they shouldn't have. I talked with Amazon and they reversed the fee, and the following day I got a overdraft fee. So I went in and asked them to reverse the fee. He told me that it was not our fault, so you're going to have to call Amazon and get that handled yourself. He then said that he would meet me half way with the fee, but no I'm not meeting half way, this was not my fault. I find that inappropriate because it was not my fault, nor their fault. They could clearly see that Amazon reversed that fee. So instead of saying that there is nothing that he could do for me and for me to handle it on my own, he could have said I see where Amazon corrected their mistake, it was your mistake nor ours so I will go ahead and reverse that fee for you, but no he told me there was nothing he could do and that I would have to fix it myself. I find that very unsatisfactory, I've been a customer of theirs for ten years, and I've had fees in the past and sucked it up and paid for it, but this was not my fault. He could see that, he could also see that I deposited $600 the following day. I just had a baby yesterday and everything counts. Just for this reason I am already looking for a different bank, which is sad because I've been a customer of MY BANK for ten years now. I think that whole situation was the only thing I was dissatisfied with. It's the way that whole thing played out, and I feel like there was no understanding of the situation. When it was clear and he wouldn't do anything it made me evaluate what bank I'm dealing with.
I went in. My mother has been with that bank for years, and she passed away. Now, I have the account. I wasn't aware that there was a $15.00 charge for not having an automatic deposit. I think that somebody who has had an account there for a long time should have received a courtesy refund of that charge.
It was my fault with overdrawing on my account. So I went back to pay a fee of $35, and I was short $0.61, and I had to drive back Kendallville. I think the fees are becoming a nuisance, and I am almost ready to go to another bank because of it.
I've been banking with you guys for four and a half years, and in the last nine months the wait for the drive-thru is so long I will reverse and put it in the drop box. The wait is just so long I don't want to wait anymore.
Like you said, usually they will greet you by name. That was never done. I was with [employee name], and I told him my dad passed away and never got any condolences. It's like it was a burden to them to have to take care of it. [Employee name] said she can't cash the check for me, and that I would have to go to another bank. [Employee name] said he would be gone for a week, and to come back in a week. It was just weird why they wouldn't help me.
My friend gave me a check and they wouldn't cash it for me. They told me they had to put a two week hold on it. I don't like that. My other bank wouldn't do that.
Online banking, it's down sometimes.
Switched to paperless statements, and I had a $5 fee. I needed them to fix that for me. They checked my balance, and I was refunded for the paper statements I wasn't supposed to get.
That is the original branch where I opened my account years ago. I take deposits from my business, which is another bank, and put it into my personal account at MY BANK. That's how I pay myself my payroll when I deposit it, and it's also signed by me. That spooks most tellers that aren't familiar with my banking or me. Often times if they apparently follow protocol, they put the deposit on hold, and I find it unacceptable.
The customer service is okay. I don't particularly care, don't feel above and beyond, that is my feeling don't care. I go there for convenience. I don't particularly care for that branch.
The lack of customer courtesy; not being addressed, and not being thanked for my business. They just stand there and look at me, and they don't say anything. I don't like it when they put holds on my checks. It's an inconvenience to me, because I own a business, and they put a hold on everything.
The location is hard to get to. There is no off-street parking, you have to go in the garage. It is not open on Saturday, that's inconvenient.
Well, when I went in there to cash a check. I have a mortgage. They were more worried about if they could cash my check or not.
$36.00 for each mark. If you overdraft, there is a non-sufficient funds fee for each.
A large deposit was deposited into the wrong account. They took care of it right away.
A letter I had recieved after I got back from Georgia and I called Donna and she's apparantly the manager. The last time I got a loan I didn't need to have a debit card and checking account. This time I needed a checking account and debit card and I really didn't want to do that, but she made the decision that I have an active account that was why I came in and I didn't really want to. The only thing was I was unsatisfied with was I had that open and she was the only one that could change it. I do come in every month and I stay way ahead of my payment and she made the decision.
A lot of turnover in the employees recently, it seems.
A new teller put a deposit into the wrong account. It was my account just the wrong account of mine.
Apparently something about the bank cards, you guys had breaches. When I went to get groceries it was declined, and I had to leave the grocery line looking like I was poor.
At the Dowagiac branch, you can't deposit money in the ATM. It's archaic. And you can't put money in. I can't put money in the machine. If I want to deposit and the bank is closed, I have to go to Niles, a whole different town. If I stop banking with you, that would be the reason why, because I want to use an ATM whenever I need it. That's why there are ATMs. The branches say they're not allowed to put signs on the ATMs when they're offline. That would help so people don't wait in line to pull up to a machine, only to find out it's not working. I experienced that at the Niles branch.
Cashing of a payroll check issued at MY BANK; the required documents. You need a driver's license, and you need another form of I.D. You couldn't use your social security card.
Communication; not at the branch, but with the documentation of my loan, and what was required.
Depositing funds into the wrong account. Getting charged fees that weren't due to me. When I put cash in the bank its not available right away.
Does not have a public restroom.
Ever since I have been here, I have never been able to get a free money order or bank check. At another bank branch, they knew me and did not charge me for money orders or bank checks. I would like to see that done here, after they get to know you. I don't ask very often.
Every time we use our debit card, someone gets our information and tries to run up charges.
For some reason my deposit in my checking account wasn't properly done. They were having trouble with the one and the seven in my checking account number.
Had a problem with the deposit, and it was near tax season.
Having been a customer at that branch for 28 years, every time, they ask me for my ID when I am going through the drive-thru or even in the store. They need to put my ID on the computer so when it comes up, they have my picture. Other banks do it. They say that they do not have the technology. That is concerning. Or put cameras in the drive-thru so I show my driver’s license and will not have to send it through. I will never send my driver’s license through because they lost it once.
I added someone to my card. When they activated their card, it deactivated my card. I fixed it over the phone.
I almost closed my MY BANK credit card. I went to Oklahoma and called the credit card and said I was going there, so I could use my card. The first time I used it I went to a 7-11. It always charges $1, and it thought it was fraud, so I had to use another card. I called and said it was okay. The card never left my person, it was me. I thought it was fixed. I used it again, same thing at a furniture store. They said I needed to change the number on my card, but there was no reason to. I came back and they changed the card without my knowledge. I got it in the mail and I was mad. I had to call everyone I had debits with and change all the stuff, I was really angry. I know they were trying to protect me. It was embarrassing, I was really hacked. I was so angry, and I don't use it as much now, I only use it for groceries. I use my Chase card more. What made me the maddest was that they did it without telling me. I got no call, letter, or anything telling me they were going to do that. At least I could have had some warning. That was embarrassing. I like MY BANK, but that really hacked me. I hope they don't do it again or I am closing it. Never had a problem other than that.
I always go to Covington, because it's more convenient. When I go to the ATM, I've noticed that it's been unavailable several times. I also think they made some changes with the ATM. They haven't really changed everything, but for a lot of things, you can't just; you have to go through another process. I just think that the ATM isn't updated.
I am a new student in the country, and I opened a new account. I didn't have access to funds, accounts, or the card for the first few weeks. It took me so long to get everything set up. The waiting time for them to get the online banking registration set up.
I am self employed and get checks or payments made out to me and or my business. Sometimes they won't cash it for me or put it in my savings. I would rather have one checking and one savings account instead of four, two business accounts also.
I been dealing with MY BANK for a long time. My social security check goes in, I went in to get the $1,000 loan and I was denied. Every time I try to get a loan I get denied. $1,867 month and not able to give me a loan due to pass credit problems. I was able to get four credit cards from other banks but MY BANK doesn't trust to give me a loan for $1,000.
I bought gasoline at a place an hour away from my house. I used my MY BANK debit card. It went through no problem. I drove home and I drove to a Taco Bell five minutes away from my house. They denied my card for a $6 order. I called and they said I was not close enough to my house. They let me buy $50 worth of gas an hour away and then they wouldn't let me buy $6 worth of Taco Bell five minutes away. That's my only problem with them.
I called them. It said I had a deposit of $0. I asked if it was IRS or fraud. I had keep pressing them to find out. The person on the phone was not helpful, and I asked to speak to someone else. I was put on hold, then it took 20 minutes to get my answers.
I can't log on to online banking. They changed how I log on and I can't remember my username. It was making me get a code number every time I logged on.
I closed on a house in October. The first insurance company refused to cover house, and I learned three months after close that it came through MY BANK. I received another insurance which was a wonderful mortgage. They did not refund the first escrow check from first five visits to two different banks. The insurance company had a check. The branch manager is the one that placed the phone call that should have been done in the first place. In the first bank, she said the check would be issued. No one was willing to take ownership, and the woman at Center Street did what she thought was best. There was over $700 sitting out there that I never received. Everyone has been kind and nice. They should get nice remarks. When I deposited $3,000 into my checking account, for whatever reason the branch refused to release the money. The representative of Center Street called me at home that the system was to be back up. I had to call my broker to make sure the check was good. That was offensive. They have had nine months to see if the check was to clear. That is insulting. I am on disability income. They have had nine months. Very insulting. [Employee name], who runs the mortgage branch, wrote an obnoxious letter that the account would be debited without my yes or no if the mortgage was not paid. The letter was poorly written and did not reflect the change of the bank. That letter has to be pulled and written with concept. They should have good faith that the person who bought the house is going to pay.
I couldn't revisit my account online.
I deposited my check at 7:30 a.m. The system put a hold on my money, which was unacceptable. When I looked at my receipt, it showed when it would be available. I was very upset, and the teller couldn't tell me why the system did it automatically. And she couldn't override it. Later the excuse they gave me was that there had been a lot of frauds, so that's why their system did that.
I did a transfer on my phone app and it wasn't recorded.
I did not care the way that you stand beside the teller now.
I did not understand. I have an account, but according to the government and their rules, you cannot make more than six withdrawals out of this special account. I went over that. I guess I didn't realize that I couldn't do that, so I received some letters thanking me for my business. This didn't come from Eric, the banker I spoke with, but we did discuss it. I don't know what else you want me to say.
I didn't get my debit card yet.
I didn't have access to my accounts because of a power outage, it was down for a while. I think that it was an act of God or something. I was trying to do online banking and transfer funds to my daughter's account and I couldn't.
I don't like your drive-thru cash location. It's too low. I have complained a couple of times. I have to get down out of my SUV truck and get down on my knees to get the cash out.
I don't want my name coming up on that [omitted] ATM screen.
I experienced kind of a long time processing checks. When I called the downtown branch where I thought I left the check. I thought that is where I was supposed to call. The lady was rude. I forgot if that was where I called, and she was very nasty. So when you called The North Anthony branch, they are always very nice there. My whole family banks there. They are very nice.
I felt that I was harassed about a visit that I made. I wasn't greeted with a smile, and the teller wasn't cordial or friendly. I didn't feel comfortable when I went to go make a transaction, it was almost like I was being harassed.
I guess they were having computer problems. They were delaying everything. It took 25 minutes to get through. It just took a long time to fix it. That was the only bad time I've ever had.
I had a balance discrepancy in my checking account and I went to one branch to ask about it. They gave me the wrong information , so I went to another branch and they were able to help me out. They got me the right answer. I had to go from the far North side of town to the far South side of town to get the information.
I had a deposit made in my account that was not mine. They handled it in a timely manner. This happened on the 18th, and now the deposited amount is in the correct account.
I had a discrepancy on my account with my debit card. There was an amount removed without my approval. I called the 1-800 number, and that lady was really helpful. She canceled my card. The lady on the phone helped me more than the gentleman at the bank did. I found out that Portage Avenue took money out of my account not just one time, but twice. The guy at the bank gave me a copy of the rights of the company that took the money from me. The company refunded all of the money they took from me. The manager, Solomon, didn't really want to help. I felt like he didn't believe me. He didn't take it very seriously. I'm very careful with my checking account, and I would never agree to anyone taking out money. This was a large amount of money, and he didn't seem to take it as seriously as I did. That's how he came across. At the time, when he told me who it was, I couldn't remember. Once I did some research, I found out who it was. I took a letter to him, and I explained it to him again. He called and said there was nothing he could do. He could only give me the rights and responsibilities from that company.
I had a problem with a savings account, and it was compromised. Andrea handled it very well and took care of it for me.
I had an issues where my card was stolen. It was on a Sunday, and no one was available. It's a lousy feeling. The fraud department contacted me, but there was no live person for me to speak with.
I had checks for a line of credit and someone got into my account. I don't know how they got into my account.
I had foot surgery and was on a crutch. And, no one offered me a chair during the wait for the teller.
I had money stolen from my account and they were working with me to get it back, but it turns out that they cannot.
I had opened an investment savings account. I was told that as long as I had $25,000 combined, I would not get charged service fees. I asked for the service fees to be refunded. I told them that I wanted to be refunded my service fees, or I would close my account. I was told that another branch was going to call me, but they have not contacted me. The teller who assisted me; she did everything she could.
I had overdrafts for two different items, and they charged me $36.00 for each. I called them, and they said they would take one away. The next day, they charged two more overdrafts. I did call back after that.
I had problems setting up a savings account.
I had some problems with my checking account. I was charged $0.75 for each check I used. If I put $500.00 in my checking account, the fee is waived. However, I was told that policy was terminated. So, I went to go close my account, and that teller told me that the policy did not change. She gave me a brochure, and I kept my account open.
I had someone hack my checking account and they called me, the bank did. And, asked me if I authorized a purchase in Germany and they took care of it.
I had to go into the Bremen branch. It seemed that a teller at the Fort Wayne branch; some gal went in to make a withdrawal, and the teller used my number. I found out on the internet, and the amount was for $738.00. They pulled it out of her account, and gave me my money back. I think they should give me $30.00, or the teller should give me $30.00, instead of charging me an overdraft fee.
I have a personal loan with MY BANK. I paid more in interest this month, compared to last month. The branch manager has no clue how a simple loan works. I talked to two branch managers. She didn't want to explain to me.
I have a small business account there, and just in the last month I'm not able to balance my transactions. It's frustrating to me that I can't do that.
I have a small business. I applied for a line of credit, and they lost my paperwork. I hadn't heard anything for almost a month, so I called last week. Yesterday, the manager called me back, and he said they are trying to track it down, but they haven't found my paperwork yet. He did ask if I wanted to resubmit my paperwork, and I think I am going to. I just couldn't do it yesterday. I talked to Eric, and the branch manager, and they both have been helpful.
I haven't been able to log into my account. We've been having issues they couldn't figure it out. When they logged into their office, it worked. I don't know if it's on my end or their end.
I just don't like my checks being held until the next morning to have my money.
I made a payment in Columbia City. The next day, an employee called and told me in a very rude manner that I needed to make a payment now. She basically called me a liar. The payment had been made. Finally, I hung up on the employee.
I misunderstood the level of balance when I went under the level.  After discussing it with them they reversed the fees.
I ordered checkbooks twice, and they were never available. They said I did not have the correct address, but I had an updated address with them.
I ordered checks, and I still haven't received them. It's been at least 20 days. They were lost in the mail, and we still haven't gotten them. She reordered them on Friday. Nothing.
I ordered checks, and they came in the wrong color. And I have two checking accounts, so now I have two of the same color for the different accounts.
I sent the stuff through the tube, and she asked what to do with it. I said I wanted to cash it. She must have gotten distracted or something, because she asked me again what I wanted to do with this. I said cash it, then she said that I had to send it. I already did, it was in front of her. Oh my gosh, I don't know where this lady came from, but she asked again what I wanted to do with it. Then she asked if I wanted to deposit it. I said I wanted to cash it. I just looked at my friend that was with me. She was not friendly, or nice, and did finally complete the transaction. She was not paying attention. How could she not have known it was there? I had to tell several times that I wanted to cash it.
I set up multiple accounts, and they wanted to link them with internet access.
I signed up for e-statements, but I ended up getting charged for paper statements. It was promptly fixed when I saw that it happened. I got charged more than one time. I went in and talked to Stephanie, and I got half of my money back. She knew I signed up for it, because she set up my account. I know she emailed somebody, and then shortly after that, I got my refund. The ladies there are amazing. I've been there since I was a little kid. I always get my problems taken care of.
I spend a lot of my time outside the U.S. Teaching in China. I'm only back in the country for about six months. The frustrating thing about it is the security when I visit another country. Notices get rejected and my account gets closed down and hard to open again. Especially from a non U.S. number.
I talked to Eric at the desk. He told me one thing. Chantell, on Saturday, set me up with something else. They are very nice, but haven't been very helpful to me. I have not had any problems in the past until the last few weeks.
I told you. I couldn't get in my bank account. I took my wife's card, and the ATM didn't work, and I couldn't get the money out! It breaks down too much! Also, the sun glares off of it in the evening, and you can't see it. They need to move it. I was pretty mad! I have to get out of the car to see it in the evening. They need something over the top. I had a real big problem with that. I had to go to the next bank and had to pay $3! The ATM is down at least once a month. It also needs to be moved because it is not good where it's located. That's all. You've got to fix that to where you can see it. Otherwise I didn't have any problem.
I transferred funds into my son's account, and he ended up getting an overdraft. I don't know what happened.
I tried to enroll in e-mail statements and switch from paper statements. I did it right. There was something that didn't go through on the website. They reimbursed me for what I was charged. They fixed it and I haven't had a problem since.
I tried to sign up for mobile deposit and I was denied. I'm a new customer.
I wanted to deposit a $1,000 check, and when I went in there, the line was about ten feet long. I waited 20 minutes. After 20 minutes the line was still 10 feet long. You had loan officers sitting in their offices. You had one teller at the front, and you had another teller that was trying to help out. She would come out, try to help, and then hurry back to the drive-thru. I went over to MY BANK on Martin's at Gumwood to complete my transaction.
I wanted to do online banking, and so I was online on the MY BANK website. They turned me down. They wouldn't let me do the online banking. It was something like, my husband was the main account holder, but both of our names are on the account. We both deposit and have names on the account, so I was a little irritated. My name is on the account, and I don't have access to the online account. I deposit. I don't see why I was denied to do the online banking.
I wanted to sign up for online banking and I couldn't do it.
I was asking for a new card. It was supposed to take four days, and it took a week.
I was charged for statements. I had signed up for e-statements, and I was still being charged.
I was rounding up my payment, and they did not apply the additional payment to the principle.
I was there this afternoon to do a personal mobile deposit. It was a Department of Revenue check. The branch manager, Kathy, asked Stephanie to call customer service to make sure we could properly do the endorsement of the deposit in the mobile app. Stephanie called to check if this would be okay without a signature; they were told by customer service that yes, there would be no problem with that. I deposited the check at 2:56 p.m. I got home at 3:08 p.m. to get a notification that, no, it had been deleted, because of the endorsement. I'm happy with these girls at the branch. They did nothing wrong. They did everything right. Someone in customer service got wires crossed, and they weren't giving accurate information, or somebody else wasn't. So, I will have to make another trip back there tomorrow. The fault is totally with customer service, not with the tellers or the administrators at the branch bank.
I was trying to get information on my new home mortgage loan to see if it was an auto draw, and they got back to me on the day after the automatic draw, so I had an overdraft charge. They had phone problems. They were not able to connect me to the right people. It was actually technical problems that caused the delay.
I was using my company's credit card, and I had money in the bank, but it wouldn't let me make a purchase. This happened two days ago. That was it.
I went in and the tellers were rude.
I went in, and none of the regular tellers were there. Nobody knew who I was, and it was somewhat bothersome.
I went to close my account. I get a note that I get a $5 charge for paper statement.
I went to deposit money in the bank. I asked the teller exactly how much money; I wanted to know how much money I had in the bank, because I had to go to the pharmacy to fill a prescription. She told me that I had $170.00 in the bank. When I went to the pharmacy, they said I was overdrawn.
I went to the Bremen branch to cash a payroll check. [Employee name] gave me [omitted] for not filling out a deposit slip, and then she gave me [omitted] for not having direct deposit. I hardly ever use the Bremen branch. I walk into the Nappanee branch and the women know me. Matter of fact I went in there to make a withdrawal. Truth be told I'm not going to be using the Bremen branch anymore.
I went to the store right after I went through the drive-thru, and my card was declined. If I had known that my money wouldn't go into my account immediately, I probably would have gotten cash. There was a long line of people staring when my card was declined, and they thought I didn't have the money. I wish I had known if it was a policy that the money doesn't go in right away.
I would like to know why. I get social security. When I'm banking at my other bank, they put it in the day before that way the money was always there the day before the due date. I get it on the third Wednesday of the month.
I wrote a check on the wrong bill, used the wrong check to pay a bill and they let my account go over drawn over $200. I thought they should have given me a call and let me know. I only found out because I checked and they charged me the fee every day for that account being overdrawn and no one called. The check was $87 and the rest of my money was ate up in fees over that one check.
I'd like to be able to make mobile deposits.
I'd like to be able to, but I can't think of the name of it. I'm sorry, I'm not the person to talk to about this. My daughter would know, but I can't think of the name of it. What is it that you have to have to change something? We had problems with the power of attorney. The main bank downtown would not accept the power of attorney to take her name off of the checks, and that. It was nobody from Maple Lane when we ran into that problem. We ran into that problem when we called downtown. The downtown office wouldn't accept the power of attorney.
If I don't deposit enough, they charge me a fee. I've asked for online statements, but I can't seem to get my computer right to get them. It just makes me want to switch banks.
If I go into my computer and change my history, delete my history, when I go in to use the online system it pops up some code I have to put in. I really hate having to do that, it's a waste of my time, I hate make work things.
I'm a small business owner, and I've been going there and never had a bad check from there. And I can never cash a check and get money back. The one on Coventry sucks. They just want to hold my money hostage. I'm clearly putting money into this bank, and they still don't want to cash my checks, so I am almost in the process of getting rid of them. I get charged 30 dollar withdrawals also. But they should know me by now. They must be broke because they are really scared to lose any money.
I'm trying to get a new card. I had a name change because of marriage, and I thought I had it taken care of. That was the reason of my last visit to the branch. I still haven't received the card in the mail. I'm beginning to wonder if I'm going to get it.
Issue with debit card at ATM. Actually, it was an issue with the PIN  at the ATM.
Issues with my statements not being delivered. I wanted paper statements. They didn't send them, and then they did. It was just the confusion with that, and also with the telephone. People were not helpful when I called.
It could've been my fault. I had set up an account. I had one checking account transferring money to another checking account. It transferred money when I didn't have enough funds to transfer, causing an overdraft on one of the accounts. I owed them money.
It had to do with online banking, and I ended up having to call in because the transaction wasn't being processed.
It had to do with their checking. They said that I had overdraft protection. It only worked with my credit card, not my checks. When I signed up for it, they told me it would work for both.
It happened at another location. Something about my last name is not the same in all my documents, so it's hard for them to find my account every time. They said that they were going to fix it. They hadn't yet the last time I was there.
It has happened twice. I had a payment that I made to another bank and according to my bank, they didn't use the internet, they used the checking. Otherwise, when I made it from the internet, it didn't really go through when they were supposed to get it. They told me that it was about the check. I'm also trying to figure out what is going on at MY BANK about what is going on about what I needed to know about this payment. I finally talked to a manager and she said that it was a policy issue about the deposit slip.
It takes too long for things to post to my account, like my deposits and withdrawals.
It took an hour for them to print out a treasurer's check because of upgrades to the computer system.
It was about a month ago. I went to the drive-thru. I sat there for about 20 minutes for a deposit receipt. I was the only one there. The other day, I went in there to close my HSA. It was supposed to be a confidential meeting. They had me in the lobby. They were asking personal questions, and I didn't feel comfortable.
It was during when they were giving money to charity. I wasn't too pleased with that because they could've dispersed that to the customers and not to charity. I feel that we are faithful customers, and MY BANK isn't doing anything with their reward money.
It was in regards to cashing a check that was for two names, with an or in the name. It was for an adult's name, a guardian, unless the person was over 21. He was well over 21, and they wouldn't let him cash it. It was a real hassle.
It was just related to the down time for the website. It was down, so I couldn't transfer money over a couple of times in the past three months.
It was minor, they fixed it before anything had happened. I think it was a wrong amount returned in cash back. He received too much, and took it out of his checking account.
It was over some temporary checks. I received the wrong ones, and then there were some fees applied, but they took care of it.
It was the ATM. I went to the ATM three times, and it was out of service. It was 10 days later before they gave me the money back, and then some. You guys gave me the money back at the Dowagiac branch. The teller called and told me that the bank was giving my money back; it was awesome. I just want to say that MY BANK takes care of their own.
It was the former manager that they transferred to the new branch on Illinois Road. She wasn't a very good manager; not helpful. My nice comments didn't include her. Everyone else is great.
It was three minutes before she came to the teller window. I didn't see her helping someone else in there. When she came back, I made a comment about her being locked in the vault. I gave her my stuff and told her I wanted my balance. When I looked up, she was gone and someone else was there. They helped the other person who came in after me first. 
It was when I tried to spend more money than my bank would allow. I am allowed an amount I can spend per day. I exceeded that amount. They said it was taken care of, and it was not. It took 24 hours to get it taken care of, and I had to get angry. The local branches are good, but the South Bend office could not do it.
It was with my bank card. I was having problems. I went to the gas station to get gas on a Friday, like every Friday, and my card was denied. They locked my card. Then after I talked to the lady, she said it was an unusual purchase. So she fixed it, I thought, and on my way home I went to get something to eat for my family and it was being denied. I tried several times and I was on the phone with the lady, and she had to try several times to figure out what was wrong. Finally I was about to leave and the manager of the food place paid for my food that night because I was having so many problems with my card. That's actually why I went to the Columbia City branch. I went to cancel that card and get a new card with a new number reissued. 
It's the branch on Coldwater Rd. I am unsatisfied with the customer service. I do all my banking through the phone since I moved. I have had multiple mistakes at the Coldwater branch.
It's with Winamac branch in Winamac, Indiana. It's a particular teller, she's overbearing. She's probably in some fashion skirts around some of the confidentiality rules to banking. I've brought this up before. The Cascada branch couldn't be more exceptional. The Winamac is 180 degrees the opposite. I have quite a bit of experience with that bank because I used to live there. It's just a coincidence that I had a problem there a couple of weeks ago. Two or three weeks ago. Claudia, she's been there for a long time. I think when you're talking about putting discretion in a bank she crosses the line. I don't want to make it dramatic or subjective this has been a historical problem with Claudia. I try not to do any banking with Winamac. I have times I have to bank there. I do 90% of my banking with Cascada. They couldn't be more professional or courteous. I can't emphasize that enough. They could learn a lot about best practices by going to Cascada.
I've banked with them for centuries, and now, to think that if I don't open an account online, I get charged for checking is [omitted]. I think it's ridiculous. I opened this because my wife was head of the city stuff at Elkhart, and they recommended MY BANK highly, years ago. So, now I'm paying $30.00 for checks, and it used to be free checking. This sheds no light on the people at Martin's at all, but I am just upset about the whole situation.
I've had problems with their website, and trying to do online banking. I always use the same computer, and every time I use the computer, it acts as if it's a new computer, and I have to get a one-time passcode emailed to me. It asks me if I want to register it, and I always say yes, but when I go to use it again it's the same story.
Lack of information on the part of the teller. They have a $5.00 fee for a certain savings account, and the teller wasn't aware of it. I am due a reimbursement the next time I go to the bank.
Late fees for mobile deposits. When I got my debit card, I didn't have a PIN number. You can't deposit cash in the ATMs.
Me and my daughter went into the bank to take my name off her account because she just got married, and we needed a new bank card.  We still haven't gotten the card. They haven't done anything they said they were going to do. We wanted to change the savings account and change it into a checking account, and they still haven't done that. My daughter Jessica filled out all they paperwork and they still haven't done anything. They said they would do some investigating and they still haven't gotten back to me. This is the second time. My other daughter went through the same thing and it took them a while before she got her card.
My ATM check card expired at the end of March. I did not receive my new card. It was shipped to an address that had been closed for like six or seven years, so that was where they sent it to. I tried to activate it over the phone. It was activated, so after, I tried to use it at an ATM. It stated it was declined, so I had to go into the branch. They called South Bend, and they had to do something to get it to work.
My bank card number got stolen and used.
My card got frozen, it was the activity. I had to call to verify it wasn't fraud activity. It was a good thing.
My error for not using the register. I depend on online banking. I don't like ATMs.
My e-statements didn't go through. I didn't put any money in my account, so my account went dormant.
My mother has an account with them and so do I and for some reason they linked my account to hers. 
My mother passed away at the end of March, and I wanted to verify her account, and it was a time that her pension and social security was to come in and also a supplemental health care, which would have been automatic. I was charged 35 dollars for a stop payment, which was not told to me. They actually suggested doing it, but then when  I saw my statement, they charged and I really didn't need to do it.
My old bank use to show the total amount after I would make a deposit. It would show the total before the deposit and the total after the deposit and now I have to ask for the total. Even if they put the total after the deposit, that would be ok, but they don't. So now, I have to ask them, what's in my account now? The receipt just shows the deposit. I would like to see my present total or the total after the deposit.
My savings account was closed and I wasn't sure why. They explained why and gave me a solution. I could open another savings account or open another checking account that would make things easier. None really. I received great service.
Non-MY BANK ATM fees rub me wrong.
Okay, I just did.
Only the mobile deposit product that I can't seem to make work.
Our account got hacked. It wasn't due to anything, just a computer or security glitch. They took care of it right away, and replaced our debit card. We've had no problems since.
Overdrawn and I wasn't overdrawn. They straightened it out, but I had to get angry to get it done.
Password. Just cannot get together on the password.
Problems with the computer system. I had gone in there because there was an issue with security with my account.
Signed up to receive a debit card and have not received it yet.
Someone attempted to use my card and took $75, but MY BANK caught it immediately and contacted me.
Someone hacked into my account and tried to buy makeup, and they had to change my account number and debit card. It wasn't the bank's fault. Someone hacked it.
Sometimes my checks don't go through, but that's probably because of the company that I work for.
Sometimes, the security is over the top. I may have made a couple of transactions that may have been considered strange at a gas station or coffee house. I don't see how they were strange, but they froze my account or something. My card wouldn't work after that. Also, not letting me know that my check would not be available until the next day. They should have said something like, The cash will not be available until the next day.
Stephanie's not there. She was the bank manager and I couldn't have asked for a more exceptional person.
The account is a non-profit. They wanted the exempt number, and I can't get that. We are under another group's umbrella, and they won't give me the number. I am still not online. I just want to be able to see if a check is cleared. I don't want to be charged for a bank statement, which, so far, they haven't done. I wish I could get it straightened out. As long as they don't charge me $5.00 per month like they said they would. So, I don't mind if they don't charge.
The account that I have charges for what I have, added and extended something that I don't need. I also had a problem with my login.
The ATM didn't dispense the right amount of money. It seems that a lot of the time it doesn't work.
The ATM wasn't working.
The ATMs are down too often.
The ATMs are out of order. The last few months it's been that way.
The banker and myself are trying to get me off of paper statements, and we can't figure it out. We keep trying to go in and change it, but it won't work.
The Cleveland branch; I wasn't handled in a courteous manner. I was not satisfied.
The downloadable app would not load right.
The drive-up windows are inaccessible, because of my handicap. I have to get out of the car in order to use them, and it is very difficult and hard to do that. I needed to have coins counted, so I had to go around and go inside. They do not have a coin counter there. I had to take everything back and go to the MY BANK in Covington.
The first problem is that this is the only branch that I'm near to, and it doesn't have an ATM, and isn't open on Saturday's. It's the only branch in town. The second problem: I feel that the overdraft policy is a little strict. I made a payment a day after the account was overdrawn, and got a $30.00 fee that I didn't know about. It would be nice to have at least a one-day Grace period if your account goes over. It just seems pretty strict.
The lady that waited on me was the branch manager. She deposited my money, and wasn't listening when I told her how I wanted it. When I ordered my merchandise, I didn't have any money, so then I went down to the bank. She told me that she explained to me the way that she had put my money in my account, which she did not, and I was very upset.
The location of your branches, there's nothing open downtown. I had to go to one of your competitors and be charged for the ATM.
The minimum balance for a savings account is $300.00. I would like it to be $50.00. There is a certain time period, like 45 days, if I want to open a savings account. I want it to be $50.00. The fact that they say I have to keep $300.00 in there means they are losing business because of that. I can open a checking account for nothing. I want to open a savings account. I shouldn't have to keep $300.00 in there. $50.00; that's it. It's deterring people from opening savings accounts.
The mobile app for the bank. I had problems, but it has since been fixed within the past two months.
The most convenient branch to me is the new branch in Ft. Wayne, and the ATM machine is set too low. In order to use it, I have to get out of my vehicle. If the sun is just right, I have to get on my knees to conduct my transaction, which is kind of ridiculous when the temperature outside is below freezing. Otherwise, that's a great branch.
The one down here on Bristol Street is a regular standing bank. When I went there, the tellers were not friendly at all. The tellers need to have more friendly customer service. That was about it, really. They don't say hi and ask how I am. They don't ask to help with anything else. They were professional, but their customer service needs something.
The one out on Island Road, my experience was awful, and I called them and told them about it.
The only issue I have is the iPhone app, it doesn't work sometimes. I will put in my password and it will tell me my account is not available, and it won't show me my balance.
The person received the phone call, answered the phone call, and proceeded to talk to this person instead of calling her back or having her hold. Instead of talking to me, she made me wait while she did a whole transaction with the person on the phone.
The President refused to receive an email from a customer.
The reason I left the first time is I was unable to get a debit card, only an ATM card.
The teller did not deposit my check as a MY BANK check. Therefore, it wasn't available immediately.
The teller didn't have a roll of quarters. Yet, both the other tellers and the manager, I guess, were occupied. So I waited several minutes. I would suggest that the tellers have rolled coins at their stations all the time. Other than that, I think they're excellent.
The wait. No one asking me, Could you hold on a for minute? At least giving me some type of information on why it took so long to deposit my funds.
The wire transfer department and not getting clear answers. I sent multiple wires to Canada, and I couldn't get answers why this was not getting to Canada promptly.
Their fraud team caught a fraud in my bank account, caught them and stopped them.
There are not enough ATMs in the area.
There has just been new tellers at that branch. I have had money to deposit, and the teller deposited in the wrong account on more than one occasion.
There is one teller who acts like you are bothering her. She is not friendly. She is rude. Say you want to make a deposit (and I've been a customer there for a while)and you have $80 and you want to deposit $70, and you ask her for change so you can make the correct deposit. Even though she knows us, she will not give us change. We have to put the entire amount in. She will not look our account up if I don't have it with me. The manager is fantastic, and I love the bank very much. I'd rather not say her name, because I don't want to be pointing a finger. I would guess they can figure it out on their own. She just has a sour disposition. No, I don't.
There was a fraud problem, and I wanted to change my card number. I went to the bank, and they told me to wait a couple of days. I am really uncomfortable with using cash. I went to the bank two days ago. They told me that they are going to make a new card number for me, and that I will have to wait a couple more days.
There was a hold put on a deposit. So, when I contacted the North Anthony branch, the manager was very helpful in getting the hold removed. I was extremely happy with that branch.
There was fault on both sides. I deposited a check from insurance company that I forgot to endorse. The check was a payment for a claim. The insurance company was willing to pay it. The check went through until it was supposed to be processed. They put a hold on it. The teller didn't find the fault. I deposited the check. It got past him. It went to processing. They kicked it out. I didn't get a phone call. I was expecting the funds to be there in two days. I called, got it fixed, and it still wasn't in there. That was on the third day. Nobody would release the funds. I know they were trying to protect my funds. It was a sore spot. They could have done more to get the funds into my account. I know they are following policy. I could've been charged overdraft charges. Banks should be able to honor a check, especially for someone who has been with them for eight years. They kind of let me down. There was some fault of the bank of me endorsing the checks. I don't understand why a $1,600 check could not be honored by the bank. I realize there was some fault on my part. I take responsibility on that. The bank should have been able to do more for me.
There's a particular employee that overly talks and you can't get out of the bank. They talk about personal things. It can be uncomfortable. It's happened a couple times. I don't go inside the bank any more.
There's a world of difference between the Bremen branch and the Nappanee branch, as far as friendliness. I'm not too impressed with Bremen.
They are not open on Saturdays, and the one downtown is not open longer. I was disappointed that they were not open on Saturday.
They are rude at that branch, and the downtown branch. They act like the customers are a inconvenience, instead of being there to pay their bills.
They couldn't cash my check because the computers were down.
They didn't give me an auto loan. I went to another bank, and they did it right away.
They had a problem with their system, so when I didn't want statements sent to my home, they were sent out anyway. It deducted from my account. The process was fixed and it was put back.
They had my mother-in-law's address as my address. The teller took care of it. That was it.
They just put the money that we cashed; they put it into the wrong person's account. I caught it when I got the deposit slip back.
They mailed my debit card to the wrong address. It was returned, but I have to wait a week now.
They need to dispose of their shredded paper in the safety deposit area.
They put a hold on my card while at a baseball game because I spent a lot. I don't think I went over the $1,000 limit, but regardless I should be able to spend.
They shut down my card when I went to Canada, but I didn't let them know when I was going.
They started asking for you to write your account number on the back of checks instead of just sending your ID in. It's an extra step that is not needed.
This is the drive-thru window. I drove up and the green light was on. I sat waiting assuming that the window was open and that there were tellers inside. I waited for quite a little while. I decided to pull around and went inside. I mentioned to the teller that there was a wait to no response. I did get a very thoughtful apology without a reason for the wait.
To check my card balance, it'll say unavailable sometimes, which is weird. Other times, it works just fine.
Today I logged on my computer I always use, it said I had to verify my device. I clicked several times to send to me email and it never did. I clicked on send it to my phone and it went right through.
Transaction was put into the wrong account. Once I discovered it, I went back, and they quickly changed it. They were apologetic. When I went the ATM machine yesterday with the brand new touch screen, it didn't work, so I went to the drive-thru. They apologized, and said someone would fix it.
We dropped a night deposit off, and $50.00 of the deposit was stuck in the machine. Therefore, the deposit was $50.00 short. The tellers and manager took apart the machine and got the money. It took from 9:00 a.m. in the morning, until 4:00 p.m. in the afternoon.
We had fees on our checking account, and we shouldn't be getting them. We had the wrong account.
We just went to Lafayette. We were going to switch banks. We weren't going to use MY BANK anymore because of the Winamac branch. They are rude. We moved here and this branch was just down the road, and we absolutely love this branch. Because of them we maintained our business with MY BANK. The people here are just excellent. They are friendly. They are courteous. They call you by name. They are very customer service driven. The Winamac branch is were rude and gossipy. They are unprofessional. They make mistakes. It wasn't their fault, it was the South Bend office fault. I deposited cash and they put a hold on my cash and it caused me to overdraw. It was my fault, it wasn't their fault. First it was my fault, and then it was South Bend's fault. That's happened more than once.
We lost our old card and we talked to a man to get a new one within seven to ten days and we haven't received it yet.
We made out five deposit slips for five checks, and she only got one receipt through the drive-thru. She went inside to check on it, and the teller was very irritated. Usually we get a deposit slip for each check, because we have a small business, and it gives us a better record of each job.
We run a small business, and we have multiple accounts. The problem we have is that they put money into different accounts. I've asked them to put money in my personal account, and they put it into my business account instead. They just don't pay attention. They never look at the back of the check. We have to go online to transfer it.
We went through the drive-thru, and we made a payment on our home equity. The teller sent back one receipt for the amount, which was placed on the principal. The next month, we got a $13.00 charge for a late payment. It was a coding error by the teller. We received a letter saying that it was their error, so that we would have it for credit reference in the future.
Well someone loaned me some money and you guys charged me a fee for the money. You wired me, and I didn't like that it was actually a couple days ago
Well there was a new girl working. She was fine, she was helping the person next to me. [Employee name] came up and I told her I wanted my check deposited. She took it and walked away. I needed a copy of that check. I wish you guys wouldn't turn the microphone off. She didn't hear me when she said hello or when she came back so I had to go inside and ask for a copy. She was not very friendly.
Well, you guys don't take cash at your ATM's anymore, so I'll be banking with Wells Fargo mostly.
When I opened my account, I was told I would have no holds on my account. Also I could have a balance of $0. I tried to withdraw $20 when I had $22 in my account, and it would not let me. Then I was out with some friends and tried to withdraw $20 when I had $56 in my account and at four different ATMs. It said I had insufficient funds.
When I stopped a couple times there with the same person, I gave them my Mexican ID and my debit card through the bank. Always in this bank, I've always had this problem. They don't want to do anything with my Mexican ID. I've never had any problems in either branch that I go into except this branch.
When we deposit my check, it takes them up to three days to put it in the account. When I deposited personal checks, they were added to the account by midnight that night. We're not sure why personal checks clear faster than the business checks that I get from work.
Yesterday, I had my mom deposit money into my account, but they didn't put it into my account. It was my Christmas savings account. They had it taken care of.
Yesterday, I went to the drive-thru, and I deposited $5.00 into my account. I had $78.00 before that deposit. I woke up today, and there was $2,083.00 in my account. There should have been $83.00. It didn't belong to me. The teller made an error. I went into the branch, and talked to the manager. She said, Thank you for being honest. That was a red flag for me. Now, I don't feel comfortable putting my money in that bank.
You people want everybody to use computers to bank and deposit. They want you to do online, then charge for every little thing you do. They do this for paper statements. If you have trouble on computers, they have nobody in three branches that can help you. Maple Lane, Grape Road, and Martins. Nobody can answer questions on how to bank online. I had two direct deposits in one account. To make one account free I had to move money. I deposited $10,000 a month and they still want to charge $5. I took a bank deposit from where I work at now, put it into my checkbook. On I have to transfer to pay my bills. I have a 60 year old account, and another for my expense money. I put that in my checkbook and pay my bills out of that checkbook once a month. So now, to make that checking account free, I had to move one of my direct deposited out of that. They don't have anybody in the bank to help with computerized banking or apps. You ask them questions and they have no answer. It's all the branches. I have been thinking about changing banks. I have two checkbooks of my own, I have a mortgage there, and my wife has a checkbook, we're thinking about moving them because I get better service out of Old National, and all I had there was a credit card. They just about got my business.
